Authors
Cheng-Jih Chen
Number of Reviews
48

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
We waited out in the rain at the 34th and Lexington movie theater.
There were umbrellas up and rainslickers worn, but no lightsabres, no
one dressed as Chewbacca.  This was the 8:30PM show, and I suspect the
folks who would have come that way were going to the Ziegfeld at
midnight.  The line started to form at about 6PM, though it didn't get
serious until after 7PM.  The smartest man on line had gotten there a
bit earlier, and was sitting in a portable chair underneath the movie
theater's marquee, out of the rain.  We were in the first dozen feet of
the bunched together line, half the group in the rain, half out of it.
We did have a box of Krispy Kremes, so we were reasonably prepared.  I
have to admit -- sheepishly -- I took a bit of organizer's prerogative
and ducked out for half an hour to have a burrito dinner at Blockheads
out of the rain.
I think "Star Wars" was the first movie I saw in a movie theater.  I
guess I was seven.  This was the old RKO Keith's in Flushing, now a
burned out shell after a real estate development dispute.  A pity: it
was a landmark, decked out in a Beaux Arts style.  There's, of course,
great affection for the saga, though I realize that there's a certain
cheesiness to it all, that Harrison Ford doesn't figure out how to act
until about halfway through "Empire", and so on.  The momentum of the
movie carries all such deficits away, making them irrelevant.  It's
part of our secular mythology.
The new movie does well, and is not a godawful Godzilla-sized
disappointment, which is what some of the worst reviews make it out to
be.  Not as fun as "Star Wars", not as dark and somberly open-ended as
"Empire", but not as stupidly goofy and Ewok-ridden as "Jedi", it's
more an introduction, the first step on a path to Anakin's Greek
tragedy two films away.  Despite the cluttered plot and the slow wait
for things to get moving, it's not bad.  We see new vistas and familiar
characters in different settings; since this movie cannot be seen
outside of context, there is a purposeful, barely perceptible cloud of
doom hanging over some of these first meetings.  The action, once it
gets going in the second half, is fantastic, culminating in the
lightsabre duel between Darth Maul and the two Jedi.
It's a worthy beginning, but it could have been better.  As noted,
things took a while to get moving.  In "Star Wars", before we settle
into the story, there was a fantastic first punch of action with the
boarding of Leia's ship.  No such luck here -- the pacing failed for me
-- though we do have a fascinating view of what fully trained Jedi in
their prime can do, how much of a One Man Army they are.  Yes, it's
just like the computer game.
Darth Maul had too little to do.  We understand that he's bad, but he
doesn't do more than be the apprentice of a greater power, and
participate in the climatic sabre duel.  Vader, at least, had more to
do in the first film, and especially in the second.  His casual evil is
demonstrated in action, not simply signified in bad-ass black garb.
That the whole conflict was sparked by some sort of trade dispute is
somewhat silly.  I think it's Lucas's attempt to create a relatively
inconsequential reason for the Federation to go to war against Naboo:
mercantile issues shouldn't motivate combatants with thoroughgoing
passions in the way nationalistic fervor, the will to power or the
fight for freedom might.  At the end of the movie, the Federation's
leaders can be carted off for trial and the stripping of their trade
privileges, leaving the status quo ante relatively intact but the
insidious motivator still hidden.  My problem with this sequence of
events is that the trade dispute turned massively bloody.  It is far
too pat an ending.  I'm sure someone could have come up with a more
credible conflict to get things rolling.
I disagree with Lucas's attempt to give a pseudo-scientific explanation
for the Force.  It's deeply lame, deeply distracting: you think they're
basically mispronouncing "mitochondria", which is a real symbiotic
bacteria found in multicellular life.  This attempt robs the Force of
its mysticism, undermining the long-elaborated theme from the previous
films of spirit triumphing over machine.  Better for the Jedi to feel a
great stirring in the Force when around Anakin than to take a blood
sample.  I'd be thrilled silly if the following two movies never bring
up this point again.  By the way, I'm not touching Anakin's immaculate
conception with a ten-foot pole.
The fight choreography of the lightsabre duel between Darth Maul and
the Jedi is spectacular, far more dynamic or energetic than the duels
between Luke and Vader, or the somewhat stiffly geriatric duel between
Vader and Kenobi.  I suspect this is due partially to better effects
technology: a guy doesn't have to sit there and hand paint all the
glowing sabres frame by frame, because a computer can do this,
following the arc of a fast moving sabre more effectively.  Perhaps
more importantly, the fight choreography of martial arts films has
become more mainstream than it was in the Seventies and early
Eighties.  We expect flashy aggressiveness and balletic spins in this
sort of combat.  Anything bordering on stiff and clumsy is deemed
insufficient.
Interestingly, while the wonderful dynamics of the sabre combat exists
when the Jedi face Darth Maul, but it's not quite there when the Jedi
hack their way through hordes of battle droids.  Partially, this is
intentional: the droids pose no serious challenge to Jedi.  A more
compelling argument is that the actors have nothing to react to when
they're supposed to be facing the droids, whereas Darth Maul is
physically there in the form of Ray Park wielding a prop sword.  I
remember at least two instances where Ewan McGregor twirls and swing
the sabre casually into a droid.  There seemed to be no force, no
urgency in the action.  Well, there was nothing there to act against.
No wonder, then, that Liam Neeson wants to quit movie acting; no wonder
McGregor found the filming a chore: they spent a great deal of time
interacting with CGI characters.  This can't be fun for an actor,
spending weeks in front of a blue screen, talking to things that aren't
there.  Such is the result of technical change over the past decade.
Perhaps an intriguing analogy may be made with the introduction of
sound in film.  Silent film actors who were adept at the exaggerated
facial expressions and gestures of that type of film had a difficult
time adjusting.  What we may see in coming years is a cadre of actors
well-suited to the blue screen for one reason or another.  Consider,
though, Ebert's statement about an upcoming golden age of visual style
at http://www.suntimes.com/output/ebert1/clear18f.html.
I suppose we'll have to see what happens in the subsequent films.
Clearly, Anakin, as an apprentice Jedi, will attempt to free the slaves
on Tatoonie, and perhaps his passion to save his mother will be his
undoing, the tragic flaw through which he becomes Vader.  Hopefully,
Obi-Wan will be less stiff and constipated, with more screen time.
We'll just have to see, but I think it's a good start.

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
I've gone and reacquainted myself with "Contact" on DVD.  A wonderful
film, but I don't think it's a great film.  It has Spielbergian awe and
wonder, and a strong performance by Jodie Foster: conflicted, but stoic
and determined, with a touch of weepiness at all the right moments
(though she sits at the edge of the bed looking pensive a few too many
times).  And, perhaps most importantly, "Contact" addresses a Big Issue
-- Science versus Religion -- in a way that Americans can feel good
about.  Spirituality is affirmed, Scientists are redeemed, and we
therefore have an Intelligent Movie (tm).
I do recommend this movie (I do, I do), but I want to make it clear
that it's a Hollywood film, and that the reviewer who called it the
"Best Film of the Decade" has either only seen Van Damme movies for the
past 7 years, or is the same one who called "Batman" the "Movie of the
decade" back in 1991.  The Big Issue is addressed in typical fashion:
religion is presented in either its full Southern Baptist moral
rigidity caricature, or it is somewhat soft peddled, used more to
highlight the spiritual hole in Foster's heart than to express its own
tenets.  This soft-peddled, comforting spirituality is there to provide
background and meaning to her affirmations, and to launch her on a
climatic leap of faith.  The Big Issue is not explored beyond this.
In any case, the gist of the film is that, perhaps like Helen Hunt's
tornado chaser in "Twister", Jodie Foster's character is determined to
make contact with intelligent life in far away places.  There are
childhood scenes, where she plays with the short wave, and makes
contact with Pensacola, FL.  While her father wasn't sucked up by a F-5
twister (nor was her sister abducted by the Cancer Man), Foster's drive
is similarly made flinty by the death of her father.  
In later life, declining tenure-track teaching posts, she goes down the
path of "fringe science" and spends her time searching the skies using
the big radio telescopes your tax dollars have made possible.  This
search is ridiculed, it's funding cut off; the National Science
Foundation director thinks the whole thing is hokum.  Eventually, after
scrounging for funds, she's able to continue her research, and is on
hand to find a radio signal from the star Vega.  The signal is clearly
artificial and of intelligent design: it beats out the prime numbers,
speaking in the universal language of mathematics.  When the signal is
clearly established and monitored, it increases the quantity of
information by mimicking our television broadcasts (no, ET doesn't send
back the O.J. Trial, with the caption "He did it," stenciled in the
image).
We get a blueprint for making a vessel capable of sending one human on
a journey (proving that ET has watched "This Old House").  We go out
and build the thing (please note that $300 billion is a good 4% of
American GDP, and apt to be missed somewhere).  Jodie, of course, takes
the trip, and echoing David Bowman in "2001", we experience awe and
wonder, and she is marvelous expressing this awe and wonder.
The meat of this film is the intertwining of Science and Spirituality.
The Science of the film is presented as a cold atheism whose
practitioners demand hard facts to justify belief.  Belief without
facts is discounted.  But such Science is an spiritual desert:  Foster
is emotionally incomplete until she has a "religious" experience in
traveling to the center of the galaxy.  Science, in this film, is
presented as out of touch with 95% of the people on earth, despite,
say, the real life example of Einstein, who believed in both god and
relativity, without the exclusion of the other, and in complement of
each other.  As said, there is a reconciliation of Science and
Spirituality at the end, but this reconciliation feels a little like a
capitulation of rationality and hard thinking.  (Note:  I'm under the
impression that the book goes into more detail about god.  Apparently,
the book talks about "circles in pi" as evidence for the existence of
god, the creator of the universe basically putting his signature into
the fundamental fabric of the cosmos.  Arguably, if there were images
embedded into transcendental numbers or into Planck's Constant, it'd
say, "Intel Inside" or "Win95 Compatible".  Note that "circles in pi"
would not constitute proof of god.  It would be a non-sequitor, and not
evidence of design.)
I'm being nitpicky, but sending along the instructions for building a
vehicle is not sufficient for us to construct such a thing.  The
technology may not exist to make, say, steel of sufficient strength and
lightness.  People of the 1850s may comprehend the architectural schema
of the Empire State building, but they would not be able to execute
it.  Also, I'd argue that being able to build a vehicle of this scale
would to a fair degree tell us how it works.  This isn't quite
assembly:  we're required to manufacture the bits and pieces first.
And, as said, $300 billion is a whopping big piece of change.
The aliens are much like the Vulcans of the Star Trek Borg movie.
They're benign, mainly interested in telling us that We Are Not Alone
in person (though, arguably, sending the primes in a radio transmission
would be sufficient to prove intelligence), and to help us in our next
step in development.  Perhaps, like in Star Trek, we're redeemed by the
knowledge of a universe teeming with life, enlightened and willing to
put aside our petty squabbles, though that is only a hint at the end.
And it's a relief to see aliens who aren't not out to blow up New York,
only to get creamed by a well-placed Macintosh virus and an American
President ready and able to kick some ass.
The popular butchering of Occam's Razor continues.  The first mention
of the Razor in this film was acceptable, if not quite correct; more
than anything else, the Razor is just a statement favoring parsimony in
explanations, an exhortion not to multiply entities. (Though I was
surprised that a seminary student, interested in the interaction of
science and religion, would not have heard of it.  But then, he was
trying to pick up Jodie at a party, so I guess he was thinking, "I'll
just sit here and nod.")  The second mention was just damn stupid: we
are to accept that a conspiracy theory conforms better to the Razor
because such a theory would preclude contact with extraterrestrial
intelligence.  But, as presented in the film, contact is a far more
parsimonious explanation.  I suppose that in the film maker's mind, the
Razor always excludes ETs.  True, it's used to demolish "UFOs did it"
arguments in real life (as well as any number of conspiracy theories,
for that matter), but that's because there are better explanations than
ETs for pretty much all UFO sightings (e.g., "I was drunk").  (Crop
circles are a wonderful example: which is a more parsimonious
explanation, aliens came down and traipsed around in a wheat field, or
a bunch of drunk frat boys decided to play a prank?)  A string of prime
numbers being transmitted on the frequency of pi times a fundamental
property of hydrogen, and coming from 26 light years out (and this
distance cannot be faked because of parallax) can only lead to one
sensible conclusion.
One last thing I found interesting: at one point in the film, Foster is
required to have faith, to believe despite evidence to the contrary.
We, as an audience, are in a small way also required to have a moment
of faith, to believe or not.  But, for us, this is a Hollywood test
of faith: it is an easy test, and, to top it off, we are given proof.
It would have been more interesting if we had to choose between equally
sympathetic points of view, and if our choice had not been validated at
the end.  That proof and faith may be contradictory apparently escaped
the film's notice.
(This review isn't as good as I'd like it to be, but I'm not sure how
to fix it.  The interaction of science and religion is something I've
given some brain power to, so this film _did_ wander into old dark
corners of my intellectual attic.  I lean towards the harder Martin
Gardener style of skepticism, and believe that there are arguments that
can be dismissed out of hand.  But I do not preclude the existence of
god or any such; that simply is a question that cannot be addressed by
science.  More, if there is a god, then either god is embodied in
physical law, or that you must subscribe to the Church of Last Thursday
(i.e., the universe was created last Thursday, with an appearance of
looking 15 billion years old).  I think in the end, I was hoping for a
more rigorous argument in the film.  Oh, whatever.  You have the
review.)

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
OK, a whole bunch of things.  Yes, James Cameron, one of the foremost
action directors of this day (and we won't mention the Academy Awards
last year), had apparently spent some $200M to make a teen romance
featuring that well-worn theme of carpe diem that's been threaded
through what feels like every other American movie of the past decade
or two.  This is serious chutzpah.  The results are stunning.
The plot is simple: young, upper class woman in an arranged marriage
meets starving artist on a boat trip, falls in love and is redeemed,
her spirit is set free.  She doesn't marry into arrangement and
strictures, but instead seizes the day.  The choices are black and
white, without shades of gray or moral choices.  We've seen this fable
any number of times, and there really are no surprises in how this
story is told.  There are no twists; the ending is expected; the
acting, Kate Winslet excepted, sucked.  But Cameron tells this story
reasonably well.
And he weaves this story into that of the Titanic, and gives this theme
of carpe diem prominence over all the other stories and fables that you
can extract from the sinking.  "Titanic" is mythological: there are the
morals of hubris, of class confrontation, of one's conduct in facing
death, of dilemnas and choices of survival and survivors.  These themes
are present in Cameron's film, but they're secondary threads.  The love
story between Winslet and DiCarpio is primary, and many of these
subsidiary ideas can be interpreted through it.
So, just to hit the points, the working poor stuck in Third Class, on
their way to America to make a new life, have the noble poverty thing
going for them, an exubrence and freedom in simple things.  In contrast
is the self-appointed royalty in First Class, who air kiss, wear
corsets, and are merely on seasonal migration between Europe and
America.  They're no fun.  You can imagine where DiCaprio has a cabin,
and where the bad guys come from.  (Interestingly, we don't see Second
Class passengers, who presumably would be middle class, perhaps
returning from a once in a lifetime tour of Europe.  I suppose this
would have clouded the issue.  Oh, random semi-ironic fact: the largest
cruise ship in the world today, which I think makes Titanic look like
an overgrown tug boat, belongs to Carnival "Kathie Lee" Cruises, making
circuits of the Carribean, a sea free of icebergs.  Presumably, the
people on this ship may be exclusively middle class.)  The hubris bit
with Titanic is obvious, though it's extended to First Class
passengers, when he men retire to cigars and cognac after dinner --
their illusions of power are as fragile and as vulnerable to strokes of
fortune as the ship itself.  And so on.
The theme of carpe diem is built through two main motifs: time and
luck.  Clocks and reminders of time are everywhere in the film.  The
ship departs at a specific time, and the collision with the iceberg is
noted with due percision.  DiCarpio meets Winslet next to the clock,
the ship is due to sink in an hour, the Carpathian won't reach the
wreck for four.  The Titanic's architect, while waiting for the ship to
go down, spends a moment to correct a clock's time against his watch.
And the distance between now and then is 84 years.  Time is fleeting,
permanence is an illusion, so seize the day.  Similarly, luck manifests
by itself, and you can't presume to make your own.  DiCarpio gets on
board through a lucky hand of poker, changing his life and Winslet's.
Cal the Evil Fiance presumes to make his own luck, but this is
silliness.  The moral is almost Taoist: let Fortune take charge, live
day by day, and attempts to control your own fate are futile and
counterproductive.
A few moments that may seem cheesy in any other film somehow works in
this one: Winslet and DiCaprio at the ship's prow, flying over the
ocean through belief and a strong breeze; the dolphins escorting the
Titanic as she heads to the open ocean.  These images are used
earnestly, without irony, and Cameron invokes a strong enough illusion
to make them work.  Most amazingly and most effectively, the
superimpossion of the corrupted wreck at the bottom of the ocean with
the bright, shining ship in life.  Cameron evokes ghosts in these
transitions.
In addition to these scenes that walk the fine line between cheesiness
and wonder, Cameron is able to vividly invoke disaster and hell.
There's the majestic scene when the stern rises up and then breaks
apart from the rest of the ship.  The law of gravity clearly hasn't
been revoked.  And perhaps most haunting is this vision from Dante, as
a lone lifeboat goes back to look for survivors.  Bodies bob on the
ocean, suspended by their life jackets.  And the life boat picks
through this grotesque flotsam, guided only by flashlights.  It's a
surreal image, very stark and invocative of the Inferno's ninth
circle.
I think I've meandered about this film enough.

Title
Review for Career Girls (1997)

In a weird fit of synchronicity, I'm sitting in this coffee shop, and
they have the Cure on the stereo.  The "Boys Don't Cry" album I think.
The Jungian cosmic coincidence part: I saw the Mike Leigh film last
night, "Career Girls", and, in the flashbacks, the Cure provides aural
texture for many of its scenes.  The movie is about the reunion of two
college roommates, 6 years after they last saw each other.  The time
they were in college was the late 1980s, and I guess Leigh fixed on the
Cure as signature music of that time and place.
Movies that take place in whatever decade uses signature music: the
Fifties with Elvis and Buddy Holly, the Sixties with the Beatles, Beach
Boys, Stones or whatever, the Seventies with disco.  Films that span
decades, like "Grace of My Heart", changed musical style by the scene.
I'm not sure what the music of the Eighties should be.  Early Madonna?
Boy George?  U2 when the filmmaker is trying to convey "earnest?" And
ten years from now I suppose we'll hear Trent Reznor and Garth Brooks
interspersed with images of Alan Greenspan in "Forest Gump III:
Irrational Exuberance".
In any case, Leigh's previous film was the great "Secrets and Lies".
The events of that film unfolded when a young black woman decides to find
her biological mother.  Mom turns out to be a working class white woman.
The latter freaks: she never saw the baby, and put her up for adoption
immediately after birth.  The film also has a second major story,
concerning the mother's brother and his family, and their particular
struggles.  I can't say much more: you'll have to see the movie.  It's a
fantastic film.
"Career Girls" therefore has to follow one of the best films of that
year.  It's not a bad film in its own right, but comes up as
disappointing given its predecessor.  I expected more.
I'm probably following some of the reviews I've read in these comments,
but so be it; many of their points are correct.  The film takes place
in the present, over a weekend reunion.  There are extensive flashbacks
back to their college days, illuminating certain significant events.
In the present, as they go through London, they bump into people who
figure in or trigger these flashbacks.  Note that the flashbacks don't
necessarily happen after they meet someone, but may precede the
encounter.  Synchronicity by example.  It feels forced.
This may be one of the flaws of the film.  Or, rather, it's in contrast
to Leigh's usual style, as someone noted: the past is used to
illuminate the present.  In "Secrets and Lies", the present speaks for
itself:  small gestures, looks and silences describe the characters'
histories and relationships.  In "Secrets", there is nothing so crude
as a handycam traipsing through a messy flat, Robert Smith crooning
"Just Like Heaven" in the background.  These flashbacks, in my opinion,
don't necessarily make it a bad film, but they make it far less subtle
than the other one; it's less than what the director is capable of.
I have more or a problem with the past as it's depicted.  The
characters in their youth are collections of ticks and nervous gestures
verging on neurological trauma.  These characteristics are actually
funny at first, and at second for that matter, but they get tired by
the end.  And it feels like the film is using a collection of
hyperactive spasms in place of more concrete development.
The relationship between past and present is another problem.  As said,
synchronicity abounds.  It closes the events and characters in a tight
circle: very little of what's shown in the past and what happens in the
present are outside of this circle.  I don't necessarily find fault
with this particular structure: one can argue that it's tight story
telling, with these characters existing solely for this particular
tale.  But it's different from depth of character found in the previous
film.  In "Secrets and Lines", there is a background that's not quite
illuminated, a feeling that there's a great deal more than what's shown
on screen, that there's a lifetime of experience off-camera.  In
"Career Girls", the matter is closed; there's nothing more here.
And perhaps this leads to a final point.  The characters' lives are
shown as "empty" in the present.  There is a curious disconnect from
between the past and the present in this regard.  The flashbacks do
little to illuminate their lives just before the film starts.  They
only serve to give background to events during the reunion, and little
else.  It's as if the characters exist only at two points in time:
their years in college and this weekend.  

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
I'm not sure how many TV series have been moved to the big screen before
the end of its small screen run.  Actually, I'm not sure if there are
that many TV series that are brought to the big screen at all: it seems
to be an 1990s phenomenon, though there was Star Trek all those years go.
Mostly, what we see are nostalgia trips ("Flintstones", "Lost in Space",
the "Avengers") ironic revivals ("The Brady Bunch") or Ideas That Should
Not Have Been Thought ("Dennis the Menace").  But we'll probably never
see (thankfully, actually) a "Friends" movie, though it may feel like
that each and every Jennifer Aniston or David Schwimmer romantic comedy
is an alternative history of the TV show.
So, on Friday, "X-Files" has joined "Beavis and Butthead" and "MST3K"
as the three TV shows I can name off-hand to have made it to the big
screen before their runs have finished.  It should be more successful
than its two predecessors.  While it may not make the American Film
Institute's Top 100 films (not exactly an authoritative list), it isn't
disappointing, like "Beavis and Butthead", or why-bother like "MST3K".
I had hoped "X-Files" would have been more ambitious.  Considering the
series internal mythology and its threads of continuity, my idea of an
"X-Files" movie would have been a movie that could have been dropped into
the existing series as-is.  It would have been a vehicle to carry the myth
arc from the season finale, and leave questions for the season premiere.
The series would have torn down the increasingly tattered curtain between
small and big screens.
Yes, this would have shut out people who don't watch the series, but it's
unclear if it'd be that much of a loss.  I don't think that many non-fans
will see the movie, and there are some 20 million people following the
series.  At $5 a pop, you have a $100 million movie.  Plus repeats,
because people will watch it several times to dig out the myth-arc
clues or the tiniest indicators of the Mulder-Scully relationship.
The strength of the fan base depends in large part on exploring these
mysteries.  Yes, it'd make less than "Godzilla", but Chris Carter et al
wouldn't have staked $200 million in a movie that'll make $150M.
The "X-Files" movie, as it turns out, was made to be more accessible to
general audiences, and this robs it of a lot of punch.  Whether the movie
will be well-referred to next season is open to question.  Certainly,
the elements of the past finale aren't present, beyond an off-hand
reference to the closing down of the X-Files as semi-organized activity.
A recurring character does die, so I suppose they have to say something.
He, however, was not as significant as Deep Throat, Mr. X or the
Cancer Man.
In any case, the centerpiece Conspiracy plays a little like a Monster of
the Week.  The uninitiated have perhaps heard of the Conspiracy, would
expect to see it in the movie, but it feels there more for scares and
chills than for advancing the myth-arc.  Yes, things are revealed about
the nature of the black oil and what the Conspiracy is up to, but not
much more than we know already.  The main datum is that the Conspiracy
itself, in setting up a double-cross, has itself been double-crossed.
Besides this, Scully has to be rescued by Mulder.  At the end, Cancer
Man is talking to someone else, and there's a "curses, foiled again by
Mulder" moment.  General audiences may wonder why they don't just kill
Mulder -- they've offed others.  I suppose, in the space of this movie,
it was too much to go into the Mulder-is-an-unwitting-pawn (i.e., "Luke,
I am your father") thread that was touched on in the past two seasons.
Yes, the speculation was wrong, but there still seems to be something
special about Mulder.
One thing that surprised me was the apocalyptic themes in the film.
While apocalypse and millennium may have lurked in the background of
the "X-Files" (and is the centerpiece of Carter's other series), there
has never been a sense that the Conspiracy would lead towards an almost
Biblical end of the world scenario.  Yet that is what the movie implies,
in no unclear terms.  I think it's an interesting change, though I'm
not sure if it's a good one.
The movie, being a summer movie, isn't the height of originality.  There
are clearly bits and pieces from "Aliens".  Actually, this reduces the
extraterrestrials a fair amount.  Prior to this, the aliens lurked in the
shadows; it wasn't clear if they even existed outside of Mulder's mind.
Now, we see them a bit more clearly: not quite men in rubber suits,
but they've lost the sense of the sinister, the diabolical.
There are also Lovecraftian influences.  "X-Files" has had Lovecraftian
stories before, but mainly having to do with funguses hiding deep in
the ground.  This is similar: underground viruses that have existed for
eons, a trip to Antartica.  Perhaps it's more fitting for the end of the
century: viruses and things that violate internally, rather than Great
Old Ones menacing externally.
Oh, one somewhat cute thing: Mulder and Scully finally lock lips, but
only in a Xena-Gabriel or Xander-Buffy sort of way.  This is actually
unrelated to any Shipper revelation.  As a tease, a bone was tossed to
Shippers earlier.  It's unclear if this bone will lead to anything else
in the upcoming season.  The Scully-Mulder interaction is fairly good
in the movie, a bit looser than it has been for most of this season.
There's a personal-crisis-must-happen-in-movies theme, of Scully being
transfered to Utah.  It, of course, is resolved by re-opening the X-Files
as an investigative unit at the end of the movie, but I thought it'd make
for a nice way to move the series to Los Angeles: Mulder and Scully are
sent out there as a condition of re-establishing the X-Files.
All in all, I liked the movie. I thought it could have been more
ambitious, but I was entertained.  It's nice to see scenes unfolding in
Washington or Texas, instead of South Vancouver or East Vancouver.
"The court determined that Fox TV does not impede free and fair
competition in the teen-angst soap-com genre, therefore Party of Five
need not be broken into five 'Parties of One,' one being distributed to
each of the other networks."
-- 
"The court determined that Fox TV does not impede free and fair
competition in the teen-angst soap-com genre, therefore Party of Five
need not be broken into five 'Parties of One,' one being distributed to
each of the other networks."

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)

I suppose it was inevitable.  The end of the Cold War, and all the
geopolitical change that entails, finally made its effects felt in a
Bond film.  The Cold War really is over.
Yes, "Goldeneye" was called the first post-Cold War Bond film, but it
was only that way simply because it was made after 1991 and had the
Russians as friends from the start.  There was the self-conscious title
scene with the usual sillouetted naked ladies, this time wielding
hammers and sickles, but the film still had an old Bond feel to it,
whatwith with supervillains and plots to take over the world with a big
ray gun.  Instead of SPECTRE and Blofeld, we have renegade Russian Army
units; names are differnt, but methodologies are the same.
The new Bond film, though, is far more embedded in the late 1990s.
Yes, there are nifty gadgets, impressive I-want-to-do-that
globetrotting, beautiful women (Teri Hatcher needs something to do
nowadays) and serious cars, but there are material changes in this
installment.  The Russians aren't even mentioned except in the
pre-credits teaser.  And, then, even that mention has a certain
post-Cold War mixture of dreadfulness and decline, referring to loose
Russian controls over their nuclear weapons.  Not quite Russians as
Keystone Kops, but certainly not Russia as fearsome superpower.
The main foreign country, in fact, is China, but this is really a minor
point.  The filmmakers simply pick the country that's vaguely
threatening, certainly powerful, in a sort of fill-in-the-Great-Power
way.  Amusingly, at least to Americans, Britain is still shown having
geopolitical weight.  I suppose in this way, the new Bond film looks
back to the Empire, or at least to a Britain that wouldn't have had a
hard time taking on Argentina.  Even in the Connery films, it was
acknowledged that World War III would be fought out by the Americans
and the Soviets, with Britian only as a supporting player.  My guess is
that this episode of imperial nostalgia was brought about by the
handover of Hong Kong around the time the movie was released, a sort of
schoolyard "we didn't really have to hand it back if we didn't feel
like it" mood.
The real innovations of this film is the focus on Ted Turner as a Great
Power.  The historical reference is Hearst and the Spanish-American
War, but magnified by satellite TV.  Missiles, warships, and all the
other tokens of military power are subservient to almighty broadcast
news.  That CNN logo in the lower right corner, so indelibly etched
into our memory of the Gulf War, of NATO airstrikes, of any situation
that potentially means war, has, in this Bond film, been elevated to
superpower status.  (I would have been amused to see "logo burning"
legislation before the Congress.)  Great Power conflict has been
morphed into ratings wars and sweeps week.  While not exactly a new
concept -- CNN, I think, caused America to send troops to Somalia and
ultimately Kosovo, and I'm sure there have been scads of academic
papers being shed on this subject -- I suppose the idea achieves a
certain pop culture status by its inclusion into a Bond film.
The Bond Girl in this installment happens to be Michelle Yeoh, who we
know is more than capable of kicking Pierce Brosnan's ass.  A minor
issue: we can safely assume she's not on the motorcycle that's jumping
over the helicopter, whereas in the Jackie Chan movies, she really,
really is on the motorcycle jumping on the moving train; the blooper
outtakes shows her missing a number of times.  The thrill isn't quite
the same.
Oh, yes, the self-referential toss-offs.  There's the one that was on
the TV ads: "Bond... you know the rest": Bond, as entirely embedded in
popular consciousness.  He doesn't even utter his tagline "martini,
shaken not stirred".  Teri Hatcher does this; she knows what his
favorite drink is as well as the rest of us.
A more interesting Self-referential Moment is near the end.  Yes, the
big bad guy has once again explained his secret plan before attempting
to kill the good guys (at least there's a motive for this peculiar,
recurring stupidity: "I like an audience").  Just before Bad Guy gets
waxed, Bond tells him that the most important thing in the media biz is
to "give them what they want."  The bad guy then expires in a very
ouch, very messy way, giving all of us what we expect to see finish a
climatic mano-a-mano at the end of an action movie.
One oddity is Teri Hatcher as a previous love interest/entanglement.
Seeing her again is sufficient to drive Bond to drink (more).  I don't
believe he's acted like this before (that whole marriage thing
excluded, though that's immaterial since that's forgotten with this Gen
X Bond).  This is a change from the autonomous independent Bond,
perhaps an attempt to give him a new past.  It's a half-hearted effort,
and the filmmakers drop it without much issue.  I don't think it works
-- our image of Bond is already fixed.
Bond, thankfully and entirely unlike Ethan Hunt in "Mission
Impossible", does not have a Macintosh laptop and does not even mention
the Internet.  This saves us from having to mock the movie for a really
bad depiction of retrieving e-mail or that the Mac has powers to upload
a virus into an alien mothership (thereby saving the world).  Think
Different.
Perhaps one thing that isn't there to give it a truly late 1990s spin
is the lack of conspiracies in smoke-filled rooms, UFOs and maybe new,
exotic plagues.  But that may be a peculiarly American way of
thinking.  Or, maybe, something to put into 1999's Bond film.
Oh, at the end of it all, I liked the movie.  It's fun, perhaps not the
best Bond film, but up there.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Each person sees a movie a bit differently.  It comes from bringing our
own backgrounds and experiences to the movie house, perhaps shaded a
little by how good dinner was, or whether the subway was crowded.  I went
to "Saving Private Ryan" with a sort of international politics background
(well, school, not flying between Tel Aviv and Damascus negotiating
Mideast peace; note that this is not a practical subject unless you're
in certain places) and a diet of recent Stephen Ambrose books about the
war in Europe.  This is a Big Picture background: the goals of Allied
Grand Strategy, the scope of American wartime production, and so on.
Ambrose described D-Day as the essential act of American foreign policy.
That's a bit of the flavor of this thinking: the war in the context of
international relations theory, the war as the Last Crusade.
"Saving Private Ryan" takes the point of view of the foot soldier.
The war from there is gory and loud, a confusion of random, sudden death.
Reports about the first half hour of the film are true: Spielberg doesn't
hide behind the Hollywood illusion that bullets and explosions merely
cause a painless spurt of cosmetic blood.  They disfigure.  This is in
contrast to the cool technical mastery of, say, Tom Clancy's "Patriot
Games" -- war as bloodless video game, conducted from air conditioned
control rooms -- or the calm efficiency of movie SWAT and Special
Forces teams.   An early gasp from the audience came when disembarking
GIs ducked underwater, only to be killed by German machine guns: only
for James Bond do bullets stop at the water's surface.
One interesting thing is that there is no long, establishing shot of
the beach assault.  In films of this scale, there's some effort made do
dramatize the size of the events.  "The Longest Day" had any number of
shots of hundreds of infantrymen storming across the beaches and
glimpses of the invasion fleet stretching from horizon to horizon.
Ambrose's books mention the never-to-be-repeated view of hundreds of
landing craft heading to shore, as seen from passing aircraft.  "A
Bridge Too Far" showed the air armada flying overhead, and the
wide-ranging battle across all of Holland.  Concerning a different era,
"Gone With the Wind" had the famous shot of the Confederate wounded in
Atlanta.  Big, important things are afoot.
"Ryan", on the other hand, shows only one or two landing craft at
once.  It's only well after the landings have been complete do we catch
a quick panorama of the men and equipment being unloaded on the
beaches.  Prior to this, but after the objectives were taken and the
battle won, there was a shot of the dead and wounded on the beach, but
the focus is, again, on the individuals who make up this horrific
composition.  Later, Tom Hanks mentions, vaguely and hand-wavingly, in
one of those off-the-cuff conversations, the sequence of events that
have to happen before the war ends: first Caen has to be taken, then
such-and-such, then Paris, then Berlin.  Then they go home.  From the
infantry's point of view, all this takes place on a different planet.
They're concerned with the here and now, with accomplishing their
immediate mission.  And, as the title and the tag lines suggest, the
mission is about just one man.
Well, that's the framework for this movie: after the beach assault, Tom
Hanks must lead a squad of men through Normandy, to find Pvt. Ryan,
whose three brothers had just been killed in the war, and whose mother
had received three telegrams from the War Department in one afternoon.
He gets to go home, to spare the family the loss of all its sons.
Ryan, though, is someplace in the battlefield, far from where he's
supposed to be because of the confusion of the parachute drop.  While
searching for Ryan, Hanks's men find themselves in a variety of
situations, some of which are meant to put on film previously glossed
over moral ambiguities in this most moral of wars.
The German soldiers in the film are just sort of there.  Only two have
speaking roles, one of whose consists of two or three lines of
taunting.  The ambiguities do not come directly from them -- they're
props as much as anything -- but from the conduct of the Americans in
relation to them.  Further, the Americans take on a number of roles
through the film.  In the beginning, GIs are assaulting heavily
defended positions.  At the end of the film, the Germans are on the
offense, and the Americans are holed up as the German beach defenders
were, with their enemy walking into pre-planned killing zones.  In the
first half, a German sniper fires on the GIs from a bell tower.  The
roles become reversed by the end.  Generally, we don't see a German
point of view.  The emphasis is clearly on how the Americans act.
And the actions of Americans range from cruel to something more noble,
from cowardice to courage, from unthinking to compassionate.  The high
points are what we've come to expect and believe about GIs as crusaders
in the Second World War, the low points flirting with what we may
consider reprehensible conduct by our soldiers.  And I suppose
Spielberg should be commended for pointing out that in an enterprise as
large and as complicated as war, we won't always hit the highs, and the
lows are sometimes comprehensible.
It should be noted that there have already been morally questioning war
films.  For Americans, Vietnam is the standard setting: clearly there
were atrocities committed by US soldiers there, in awful contrast to
shining American ideals.  World War 2, though, has been relatively
sacrosanct.  In a real sense, this was the Last Crusade, when we were
clear on who the bad guys were, when we could have at them on the
battlefield and when we could come out winners.  Nazis became great for
cinematic evil:  spiffy uniforms and historic menace in one
goosestepping package.  This sort of moral clarity is certainly dead by
the end of the Vietnam war; with few exceptions, the only clear cut
good vs. evil war movies involved giant space bugs and Doogie Howser,
or environmentally incorrect alien invaders and Apple Computer saving
the world.
Is it possible to make a morally unambiguous war film today?  There's
been perhaps one Gulf War movie, which was as much about Denzel
Washington's inner guilt over a friendly fire incident as anything
else.  The dilemmas in "Courage Under Fire" are caused by accidents
rather than deliberate conduct.  But then, what would be the point of
such an unambiguous film?  The world is different now, or perhaps we've
realized there are gray areas, and valid reasons for and against.
Does Spielberg succeed in showing that war is a tangible hell, that
Americans weren't always in the moral clear?  I'd argue, yes, from the
effect on the audience alone.  At the end, in what would normally be a
woo-hoo moment as the last Tiger tank is killed, there was hardly a
peep from the sold-out audience.  The rah-rah had been exhausted.
There are of course faults with the film.  From a pure wince
perspective, the final few minutes contains an awful, awful speech,
where the war veteran makes a terrible, predictable, cloying speech.
He asks his wife if he's led a good life, if he earned the long-ago
sacrifices and the right to go home.  I suppose he represents America
after the war, asking if America has "earned" the Second World War
sacrifices through its post-war conduct.  It was a truly bad scene,
where all the stereotypes about the Spielberg sentimentality come on
display.  While thematically it's not out of place, it just feels
poorly done.  But, while clumsy, this is more than anything else
fumbling towards the conclusion that, perhaps, yes, America has earned
it, and the sacrifices were more severe than had previously been shown
on the screen.

Title
Review for Governess, The (1998)
Minnie Driver's new film: it's one of the "Governess in Remote Estate"
genre, something I understand better than the "American/Briton in
Italian Villa," but, really, that doesn't say much.  The latter is
entirely mysterious to me; the former is less so, only because of the
good old high school reading list, which included more Bronte sisters
than you can reasonably expect to see in later life.
This new film takes place in the 1820s or 1830s, and throws a few
twists into the usual story.  The first one, not truly remarked on for
most of the movie, is that Minnie Driver's character is Jewish.  To
kick off the film, we see an interesting depiction of Jewish life in
early 19th C. London: a marginalized culture, almost wholly insular,
with its own rituals and institutions.  Gentiles are the great unknown,
and the only interaction between the two groups early in the film is an
exchange of insults between Driver and a pair of street hookers.
Driver's father dies early on, leaving the family in debt.  Instead of
marrying a rich old fish monger, as her mom wants, Driver takes on a
Gentile name, Mary Blackchurch, and becomes a governess.  Her first job
is at the aforementioned remote estate, on a remote Scottish island,
the Isle of Skye.  Travel before the invention of railroads just sucks,
but there are very nice shots of the North Sea, almost flat as a mirror
at times.  In any case, the archetypal trappings of the remote estate
are there: a bratty charge, a distant wife, a dynamic if emotionally
closed master of the house.  Things develop as expected.
The second twist comes about in this part of the film.  The estate's
owner is an inventor, trying to come up with the right chemical
solution to "fix" photographs, so the images captured by camera won't
fade immediately after they're taken.  So, woven into the usual
governess story is a meditation on the capturing of indelible images
and memories.  This is a romanticized, compressed history of the
invention of camera film, but it provides the filmmakers with a nice
opportunity to show large, airy chambers filled with fluttering
photographic prints, art photos that you won't find in Daguerreotype
archives.  Presumably, there was some meditation on eyes, observation
and their relation to memory as well, but that was far too subtle for
me, so we'll skip it.
The relationship between the lord of the manor and the governess is
done fairly well, with the expected bright, sunlit moments amid sturm
und drang as the affair's barometer bobs up and down.  The lord's son
makes an appearance later in the film; he's read too much Byron,
apparently, something the flouncy shirt and haircut gives away.
Hijinks and revenge ensue, and the governess leaves for the calmer
environs of London by the end.
The epilogue is a curious one: she becomes a photographer in her own
right, specializing in capturing the heritage of her people.  This
ending feels a little tacked on, as her people aren't really remarked
on for most of the film, not in any meaningful way.  Yes, there's a
dramatic moment or two somewhere in there, and the Jewish-Gentile thing
highlights her isolation in Scotland, but it's not organic to the film:
she could have been a worshiper of Bob the Subgenius for all it
mattered.
As a side note, I saw the preview for this film a couple of days
later.  Golly: what a Harlequin Romance!  It's not that bad in real
life.  "The Governess" is supposed to be the director's first film, and
it's a fine first effort.  Some of the photography is gorgeous, though
the movie was a little longer than it could have been.  I didn't find
the story that intriguing, but that may be me.  Quite watchable.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Possible Gap product placements in "The Matrix": Khakis Explode?  Khakis
Virtual?  CyberKhaki?  In fact, there's a perfect moment to yell out
"khakis?" in a crowded movie theater: soon after Lawrence Fishburn
says, "You can get anything you want," that's the right time.  MST3K
could not have asked for a better lead.
Actually, the movie isn't MST3K fodder, beyond the usual quota of Keanu
moments; these pass quickly, though they're worth a few chuckles
("Keanu Fu").  Perhaps the best way to describe "The Matrix" as a movie
is to say it's some sort of live action Japanese anime.  You have the
hyperkinetic martial arts, the bad-ass pose downs for which the movie
lives, the impossible body dynamics of being tossed at a brick wall or
leaping gulfs, perhaps even a large-eyed woman if you use a little
imagination with Carrie-Ann Moss.  It's a fun, mindless action movie,
featuring the aforementioned Martial Arts Plus, prodigious amounts of
ammunition, and Quake-like charge-into-big-room-and-shoot-everyone
video game violence.  What more can you ask for?
Beyond style and action, I'm not sure what else to say.  Keanu's
character appears to have no past, so that's an indication of his
alienation from this world?  All the eye imagery and the sunglasses
indicate how strongly the world is based on perception?  I'm sure that
we can come up with lit crit that talks about the eye symbolism in this
movie, and the focus on sunglasses, mirrored or otherwise, and how
Agent Smith's pupils are apparently manipulated during the
interrogation scene to be more square than round.  But, you know, I
think all the sunglasses are there to look cool, and they're just
showing how Smith is the evil automaton he is.  Anyway, sunglasses go
with the black leather bad ass look.  That's what we're aiming for.  No
need for anyone to say, "hey, you're driving at night, take the glasses
off!"
Yes, they do try for the Deep Thought at times.  The primary one is the
Information Age update of Plato's Parable of the Cave.  When Fishburn
describes the nature of reality and his efforts of freeing others from
the illusions of life, his speech is almost lifted from the Cliff Notes
on "The Republic".  The notion of the world as shadow play on cave
walls is, of course, an old, rich science fiction vein; many have been
there before for ideas, and many will be there later.  No one is really
expecting "The Matrix" to break new SF ground, and in fact the various
"the Matrix is this, the Matrix is that" speeches that Fishburn gives
are repetitive (well, Keanu isn't the brightest) and bog down the
film.  A good ten or twenty minutes can be cut from the middle, and no
one would notice.
Oh, the link between The Matrix and the Gap khaki ads goes one step
beyond the large blank white rooms where some of the action takes
place.  There's also marriage of computer and camera, with the
augmented overcranking and the virtual camera tricks that make the
freeze-and-rotate effects possible [1].  The Matrix, as noted, is a
visual marvel.
[1] http://www.slashdot.org/articles/99/02/16/0843210.shtml

Title
Review for Cannibal! The Musical (1996)
On Wednesday, instead of watching a Very Special Star Trek: Voyager
(where, I think from the promos, Busty Borg is kidnapped by other Borg
in order to assimilate WonderBra technology), we had, on hand,
"Cannibal!  The Musical".  This is an early Trey Parker/Matt Stone
film.  I had heard of it before, in the same way I heard about the
"Spirit of Christmas", but seeing it is a different experience.  
When the South Park movie (tentatively titled "Bigger, Longer and
Uncut") comes out, I hope they adopt the Star Wars Episode I movie
posters, but with Cartman and Kyle casting the shadows of Alfred Parker
and James Humphrey against a snow drift.  Truly, the spirit of South
Park can be glimpsed through the musical numbers and the cannibalism.
During a campfire scene, you can hear an early version of Cartman's
whining.  "When I Was On Top of You" is a direct ancestor of Chef's
"Simultaneous".  The cheesy cheapness of everyone wearing plaid shirts,
jeans and fake racoon skin hats parallels the cardboard cutouts that
are the essense of the animation.   The backdrops of the Rockies that
are in every outdoors scene of South Park is the location of the
desolate miners' camp, before the cannibalism begins.  Most of all, the
little Brannif jingle after the credits is the main theme to the film.
Now we know the words: "The sky is blue, and all the leaves are green!"
The movie itself is the true story of Alfred Parker, who was convicted
of murder and cannibalism in the late 19th Century, when a group of
miners he led through the Rockies failed to, well, come out of the
mountains with him.  A picture of his grave and a blurb can be found
at:  http://www.csn.net/~nulevich/graves/packer.html.  The story,
though, isn't told in a solemn Ken Burns/PBS documentary sort of way,
with sepia-toned daguerreotypes and John Chancellor narrating.  This
story is told in song.
The evocative power of song and dance is only rarely recongized now,
with the standard American musical dead of old age.  In an episode last
season of "Xena: Warrior Princess", both the sturm-und-drang and the
deep tenderness of Xena and Gabriel's relationship could only be
properly expressed in this form: this critical story, the producers saw
rightly, could only adequately told with elaborate production numbers.
The Parker/Stone film is no different.  The emotional breadth of
"Cannibal!" can only be properly captured in song; the disparate
characters are made flesh by what they sing.  From the miners' high
hopes in "That's All I'm Asking For", the desperately cheery "Snowman",
the declaration of a man's love for his horse in "When I Was On Top of
You" and Packer's leitmotif of "Shpadoinkle Day" [sic], the characters
become individuals in our eyes.  Unlike, say, the anonymous masses that
get mowed down in the average Schwarzenegger film, the miners become
familar, and we feel a pang of sorry when they're chopped up and
eaten.  It's like the emotional impact of John Sayle's "Matewan", but
with BBQ sauce.
In any case, this is a very funny movie, utterly absurd.  And it's
actually less gross than it sounds, though that's not saying much.
The tape we had was rented from Kim's Video downtown.  I don't expect
the local Blockbusters to carry it.  Unfortunately, Troma hasn't gotten
around to releasing the DVD.

Title
Review for Parent Trap, The (1998)

Ooh!  A live-action Disney children's movie!  I'm not used to rambling
on about these, so, please, be gentle with me.
This is a variation of the venerable story of twins, separated at
birth, switching places.  The trick here is that they conspire to bring
their long-divorced parents back together again, despite being
separated by 6000 miles.
Playing the parents are Natasha Richardson and Dennis Quaid.
Richardson was apparently chosen because she's British, is at the right
age, and has the glamor you'd imagine your long-lost mom would have
(yes, wishes are fulfilled in this movie, but it's Disney).  She plays
this perfectly well.  I'm not sure about Dennis Quaid.  The twins are
played by Lindsay Lohan, who, backed by her acting double and special
effects, is shockingly convincing at being in two places at once.  If
you didn't pay attention (like foolish old me), you'd believe there
were twins there.
The first part of the movie, with the twins meeting cute at summer
camp, was on the painful side.  All the cliches of precious,
mischievous kids are pulled from the usual bag of tricks.  Yes, even
the "Bad to the Bone" song playing when one of the twins struts up to a
camp poker game in dark sunglasses.  Maybe I'm just grump, but I hoped
that one twin would be made of antimater and would annhilate the other
one on contact, ending the film, or that one would turn out to be the
evil twin, Garth, but, alas, it was not to be.
The movie actually picks up once the whole camp thing ends.  They
switch places, so each can see their mum or dad, as appropriate.  Minor
fun with culture shock, touristy drives through London and Napa Valley
(yes, Mom's a designer of wedding gowns, Dad owns a winery, like most
people on the planet).  The scheme of getting mom and dad to meet has
to be hurried, because Dad has met a thin, young blonde (TYB), and,
after an 8 week whirlwind courtship (apparently occurring entirely
while the girls are at camp), they're going to get married.  The TYB,
of course, is evil.
The twins' cover is blown by the clever grandfather in London, and the
observant housekeeper in Napa.  Plus a dog: animals are smart.  Stuff
happens, everyone meets at a nice hotel in San Francisco, people have
shocked-happy looks (mom and dad) or shocked-shocked looks (evil TYB),
and, after some hijinks you know the rest.  It's not "The Usual
Suspects".
I saw this with zero expectations, and, despite having every fear
confirmed in the first part, was pleasantly surprised by the end of the
movie.  Yes, "The Parent Trap" is too long by about 20 minutes (and I
don't just mean the camp scenes), but it's not bad at all.

Title
Review for Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels (1998)
The too clever yet too convoluted title is the first problem.  The
second problem is the first twenty or thirty minutes, as our cast of
characters is introducted, with each of the individual quirks and
defining characteristics actually told to us by a Cockney-accented
voice-over.  Yes, the film blithely violates the whole show-not-tell
rule.  No, they don't get away with it.  There's really only one main
character for whom they don't do the describe-explicitly thing with,
and his whole persona is spoiled by this godawful line about cats and
sour milk.  Dialog that goes clunk.
So, LSA2SB takes too long to get into the story, spending half an hour
on what should be obvious.  The story itself kicks off at a high stakes
card game, whick one of our young heroes loses badly.  The trick in
losing is that our hero borrowed heavily from one of the local crime
bosses to call, and Our Gang has to come up with half a million pounds
(800,000USD or 740,000EURO) by the end of the week.  The bulk of the
movie is about their plan to rob their neighbors, who, in turn, are
planning to rob this gang of potheads.  The plot becomes more intricate
-- and the movie gets its too cute name -- when the only firearms Our
Gang can get is a pair of antique shotguns.  Yes, it is a British film,
not an American one, or else Our Gang could just pop into the local
Wal-Mart for new hunting rifles.  Of course, the ease at which they can
heavily arm themselves would take away from the central premise of the
movie, that of a gang of amateur robbers going about their business
with pitiful equipment.
The plot, actually, does start moving about an hour into the movie, as
crossed wires, bad scheduling, and comic coincidences actually starts
driving the long-expected humor of the film.  It is a comedy, but it'd
be hard to tell until closer to the end than is good for it.  Even
then, it's not _that_ funny.  I will admit that some of the camera work
is very nice, with some well placed overcranking and undercranking, and
a freeze frame or two thrown in.  The high point of this sort of thing,
though, is probably the card game itself, and that's where the movie
gets underway; the cute tricks get used up relatively quickly.
I believe this movie has been touted as a British "Pulp Fiction", or
maybe some cross between Tarantino and the very energetic
"Trainspotting".  I suppose any recent movie featuring violent
gangsters with guns and droll humor gets compared to Tarantino, but
this just doesn't fly in this case.  LSA2SB shows little touch with the
characters beyond the ham-fisted voice overs, and the onscreen violence
lacks a certain flair, lacks a certain impact.
Oh, it is somewhat refreshing to see deflation finally starting to work
on the amounts of money being bandied around movies.  For years, we've
had Armed Robber A getting away with $20 million and Terrorist B
demanding $10 billion.  The height of silliness is probably in "Die
Hard 3", with the bad guys knocking over the Fed.  It's refreshing to
see sums of six figures, albeit in British Pounds.  I'm not going to
count Dr. Evil asking for one million dollars, though.
Lastly, Sting has a cameo, but I'm not a devout following of Sting, so
I'm not sure where he is.

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
1) To get one of those apartments that overlook the Park, you either
have to be the Devil, or be in Satan's immediate employ.
2) The scene that most amazes New Yorkers is when Keanu Reeves goes off
to confront Satan at the end of the film.  He walks onto 57th Street,
near First Avenue.  57th Street is empty: you see nothing all the way
to the Hudson.  My reaction: "Damn, those are great special effects."
All in all, not a bad film.  The basic plot is this: Keanu, a hot shot
lawyer in Gainesville, FL, is hired by a big NYC law firm.  He's
treated like a prince, like an heir apparent.  There's the fab
apartment, vast amounts of money, rubbing shoulders with the Great and
Good of the land (Sen. D'Amato does a cameo; that he's in league with
Satan is unsurprising), etc.  He's assigned a big case: a wealthy real
estate magnate is suspected of killing wife and kids.  He's able to get
an acquittal, despite seriously believing that the man's guilty.
During the course of these events, his young wife is isolated in the
huge apartment, and she starts seeing weird things all over the place.
Weird dreams ensue, demons appear in mirrors, and so on.
I actually liked this film a lot.  The previews and the commercials
make it seem hokey, but it's pulled off well.  I also have a large bias
against Keanu being anything other than Ted (which, btw, was on TBS a
couple of weeks ago), but, unlike in, say, Johnny Mnemonic, he didn't
suck.  I suppose this was the first step in the road to redemption,
that eventually leads to The Matrix.  I watch "Buffy The Vampire
Slayer" in part for its idea of personifying high school trauma in the
form of vampires.  I suppose I can only appreciate this attempt to make
literal the idea of a defense lawyer selling his soul to get a guilty
client off.
One very nice touch: when Keanu's first in NYC (the city, by the way,
is in the "whore of Babylon" mode in the film), he's taken by Al Pacino
to the roof of the building (the office decor actually looks like a
well-lit Quake room, which merely means I've played too much Quake).
They bargain for his employment while strolling along the edge.  This,
I suppose, is a reference to the part when Satan tempts Christ in the
desert, the part when they go up on the mountaintop and Satan offers up
the dominion of the world.  Keanu, of course, accepts.  (This may be
one flaw with the film: Keanu accepts too readily; there's some moral
choice, but we don't feel it viscerally.  Keanu doesn't really fall, he
just sort of drifts down there.)
Actually, in a further divergence, I had a flashback to high school
English class, where, I think, we talked about Graham Greene or
Sommerset Maughin (sp?).  One of them extended the parable of Satan
tempting Christ with a final offer by Satan: "Go up on the cross, wear
a crown of thorns, and you will become the savior of mankind."  If I
recall, the passage goes on with Christ accepting, and Satan laughing
until his sides hurt, knowing all the wars and destruction that will be
committed in the name of god.  I'd like to read a similar thread in
this movie.  At the end, Al Pacino has grand plans for Keanu.  One can
read the sin of vanity into this, and the film's very neat ending.

Title
Review for Lolita (1997)
First thing to note: I haven't read the Nabokov.  Yes, arguably it's a
big gaping hole in what I would like to believe is my well-readness,
but there it is.  No Nabokov yet, but that should change.  Second
thing: I haven't seen the Kubrick film.  The Adrian Lyne film is the
first version of the story I've seen, for good or bad.  This movie then
exists in a sort of vacuum for me.  While bits and pieces of the story
seep in just from living in this world, these fragments are
disconnected and distorted, without real reference to their origins or
meaning.  Seeing this movie, then, brushes all this cultural debris
aside: it's a complete thing, in many, many ways unlike and removed
from the one-line synopses.
I suppose I'm left with talking about my impressions of the film rather
than how closely it follows the novel, or how this one follows the
previous one.  So: this is a good movie, pulls you into the unfolding
story and puts you in Humbert's obsessions, is able to evoke a certain
sympathy for his situation as well as horror.  It's a good film.
Humbert's interior world is brought into view in any number of ways.
The most obvious is the occassional voice-over, necessary for this sort
of film to explain and delve into his mind, and all rendered through
Nabokov's prose.  It works well, and adds to the poetry of this film.
We also listen to the mistakes in hearing Humbert experiences as he
moves through the everyday world, in particular his interview with
Beardsly Prep School.  Other touches are the gauzy sunlight and
filtered photography as Humbert sees Lolita -- yes, cliches, but well
constructed ones -- and the moths dying in the electrified bug trap as
Humbert talks to Clare Quilty for the first time, particular horror in
the mundane.
We also have a first rate cast.  Jeremy Irons is fantastic as a man
held in this nymphette's power.  He shows desperation, helplessness,
obsessive devotion.  It's all in the eyes and in small gestures.
(According to at least one review I've read, this film doesn't go much
into Humbert's cunning, as depicted in the novel.  This may be true: to
a large extent, Irons's Humbert is swept along by events, in some ways
a spectator to his actions, truly helpless.)  Dominique Swain is also
good, depicting both childish playfulness and petulance, as well as
growing realization of her power over Humbert, and perhaps a bit of
cruelty.  It's surprising this is her first acting job. (Lyne
apparently chose her after seeing an amateur tape submission for the
role: Swain reads lines from the novel, in between shooing away the
family dog from jumping on the dining room table.)  Add to this a
creepy Frank Langella as Quilty and Melanie Griffith as the mom.
Anyway, "Lolita" will be shown on Showtime this Sunday.  It'll also
open formally in theaters sometime in late September, according to this
week's issue of "Time Out".

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
I actually started writing this review well before seeing the movie.  I
felt I had to, after watching the original "Godzilla" on Saturday
afternoon (Channel 11's Godzilla marathon), and, partially again Sunday
evening (Joe Bob Brigg's Monstervision, on TNT).  This is the
Americanized, Raymond Burr playing the necessary white man in the cut
up Japanese film.  The little tricks used to integrate him into this
film -- tricks that fooled me when I was ten but look laughable now (or
perhaps I'm just aware that Raymond is tacked on, and am looking for
the visible seams; I can't claim I'm more clever now than when I was
ten) -- aren't too far removed from, say, the use of Bela Legosi in
"Plan 9 From Outer Space".  The actor died part way through the filming,
and, for the rest of the movie, they had some guy in a hat, with a dark
cape raised high enough to cover his face, stalking around.
The opening of "Godzilla" shows that Raymond Burr is acquainted with
some scientist's wife, who comes to him in the hospital.  We see the
back of her head.  A little while late, we see the front of her face,
but it's obvious this is culled from a different moment in the movie,
and that she isn't really talking to Raymond.  Later, Raymond calls the
hero scientist, who gets up from his workbench and goes to the back of
his lab.  Cut to some guy with an eye patch -- I'm not sure the first
shot of the scientist didn't show such a thing -- face heavily
obstructed by bubbling beakers, flasks and the other props of
stereotypical alchemy, who answers the phone and talks to Raymond.
Back in the 1950s, they simply didn't have the benefit of our
late-1990s ability to incorporate John Wayne in a beer commercial, and
Gene Kelly in a spot for Hoover vacuums.  Or maybe they just didn't
care.  (Joe Bob Briggs, who gives a little background to the movies
he's showing, mentioned that a couple of Americans were looking at
special effects footage for some reason or another.  They came across
"Gojira", liked what they saw, and made it into an American movie for
about $100,000.  Well, 1950s dollars, but cheap as far as movies go.
Arguably, a few minutes of computer graphics in the new movie cost that
much.)
Some recent movie reviews of the 1998 "Godzilla" argue that "Gojira",
the original Japanese film, is one of the better Japanese films made,
in some sense up there with Kurosawa.  I wouldn't go that far, but
little models and rubber suit aside, the film is supposed to conjure up
a powerful, bleak vision of destruction and despair: Godzilla as the
embodiment of nuclear apocalypse.  The clips from the original movie
that started off this American version does contain hospital scenes
that are meant to invoke memories of Hiroshima and Nagasaki.  Seeing
"Gojira" would be interesting -- half the movie was sliced up to
accommodate Raymond.  I should look for it in Kim's Video next time I'm
in the area.
Raymond says such obvious things: "Look at the size of those
footprints."  Show, not tell.
So, I suppose a new, 1998 version has the benefit of relative
seamlessness.  No need for the token American when New York is
wrecked.  On the other hand, Tokyo has a resonance of the fire bombings
of World War II -- air raid sirens sound when Godzilla approaches, and
the scenes of destruction are informed by these and by the bombings of
Hiroshima and Nagasaki -- which New York doesn't.  At worst, we've had
Disney's invasion of Times Square and Central Park.  Granted, it was
massive -- Michael Eisner made the rain go away -- but there were no
casualties except for the grass on the Great Lawn.
Anyway, yes, the various reviews I read are basically right.  The new
movie compares unfavorably to its rubber suited predecessor.
Fundamentally, the movie is an overgrown "Jurassic Park"/"Lost World"
set in New York, and with a much larger monster.  There are no
innovations in this movie: as noted, the influence of "Jurassic Park"
are very clear, though the baby Godzillas aren't nearly as terrifying
as velociraptors.  We perhaps shouldn't expect them to be: the
velociraptors were handled by Spielberg, who once gave us "Jaws"; the
Godzilla team gave us the decidedly unscary "Independence Day".
Actually, "ID4"'s little tricks with the airplanes are simply repeated
in this new movie: the flight scenes are basically the same.  [Hint to
the Godzilla team: helicopters can fly higher than buildings and large
lizards.]  Finally, they wreck Madison Square Garden, but it's no worse
than, say, Michael Jordan passing through; he can be a wrathful god.
That helicopters, airplanes and tanks can hurt this Godzilla makes it
nothing more than a large, overgrown pet gecko.  Fundamentally, it's an
animal.  It bleeds, it can be killed.  A couple well placed shots from
a tank can do it in.  A bigger problem would be flushing it down the
toilet afterwards without telling the kids.  [A side note: does
Godzilla taste like chicken?  Being somewhat radioactive, Godzilla
steak would certainly be free of e. coli, though there might be other
problems.]
Its animal nature, its mortality, makes this Godzilla less mythic than
the original Gojira.  Gojira, this invincible incarnation of nuclear
horrors, shrugs aside the army on its way to Tokyo.  Godzilla 1998 can
hardly take it on the chin, and has to get away from the army through
fancy footwork instead of simply wading through they guys with rifles.
A fence of 300,000 volt high tension wires proves more a curiosity than
an obstacle to Gojira.  Godzilla is hurt by this little electrical
cable that Matthew Broderick can hold in his hands.  Gojira is an
embodiment of existential bleakness, a force of nature for the atomic
age, a legendary dragon with nuclear breath.  Godzilla is a pest.
Regarding Matthew Broderick, I'm convinced that for the first hour of
the film he plays an idiot.  The second hour shows him as an idiot
being chased by monsters.  His dialog is painful to hear.  Real
clunkers, not unlike Raymond Burr's observations.  But even more
painful to hear is what his girlfriend says during the film.  [As a
counterpoint to Idiot Broderick, I'm one of the maybe four people in
the country who saw "Infinity", this neat little film about the
physicist Richard Feynman.  Broderick's roles have therefore proceeded
from Genius to Idiot in the past year.  Career trajectory?]  Oh,
furthering a theme that's been in Hollywood movies for far too long, it
takes a disaster to reconcile relationships.  "Lost in Space" was
really about the father-son thing.  "Deep Impact", which I have yet to
see, is apparently about solving family crises before they killer comet
hits; doomsday as a therapy session.  In "Godzilla", it's the boy-girl
thing.  At long last, they take an interest in each others work, and it
only took being chased by ersatz velociraptors to do it.  Oh, and she
gets a fulfilling job along the way, too.
Godzilla having offspring isn't a new idea.  Back in the late 1950s,
early 1960s, we had Godzookie, who was more like that short chubby kid
the bullies beat up on than a carnivore.  [Actually, reading the
summary for that movie -- it's been ages since I'd seen it -- the story
isn't badly constructed.  In this world, a little school kid is beat up
by bullies.  In his mind, in his fantasy world, he travels to Monster
Island, and finds that Godzookie is similarly beaten up on.  Godzilla
comes by, instills courage and confidence in Godzookie and, by proxy,
the school kid.  The school kid overcomes the bullies.  I like this
story and construction better than the chase through mazy hallways by
velociraptors.]  How Godzilla's procreation mechanics work is explained
in neither film.
Bizarrely, there are Frenchmen in the movie.  Jean Reno, who I think I
first saw as the Cleaner in "La Femme Nikita", plays some secret
service guy who's there to clean up this Godzilla mess.  He's there
with a dozen Frenchman, all of whom smoke.  They're hampered in their
mission because they can't get a smoking table at a restaurant.
Anyway, the whole thing is sort of bizarre.  Perhaps they were there to
drive away Godzilla by acting rude?  A side implication, most
definitely missing from "Gojira", is that these little nuclear messes
can be cleaned up without much fuss.  The teams next mission, I assume
his next job is propping up some African despot.
Lastly, some NYC notes.  You know, those moments when suspension of
disbelief fails because the film implies it's easy to get a cab in the
rain.  Yes, it's nitpicky to note that the Fulton Fish Market isn't
that far south of Wall Street for the big guy to clearly walk up Broad
Street, stomping investment bankers along the way.  The Brooklyn Bridge
is also not the closest bridge to the Park Avenue tunnel at 33rd
Street; the Queensborough is.  [Side note: the Park Ave tunnel the
heroes are stuck in is right next to my former office.  I'm sure that
Godzilla, sweeping its tail around, probably did severe damage to it.
I have to compliment the location people: they got the stores on the
west side of Park dead on.  That "hey, I bought a smoothie in that
store!" feeling was there.]  Oh, Manhattan bedrock isn't so deep for
Godzilla to borough around in.  It's actually relatively shallow --
that's why we have sky scrappers.  Similarly, the Hudson can't
accommodate a submerged sub.  An even more devastating gaffe is the
debate on how to get uptown/downtown when they're in the cab.  Everyone
knows the FDR construction near 23rd St. will cause havoc.  There are
other things, but pointing out these locational, uh, inconsistencies
should be a communal activity.
Just before writing the 1998 portions of this review, I went to see the
New York Philharmonic give a free concert in the Cathedral of St. John
the Divine.  It was a really long line, wrapping around two long
blocks.  There was no such line for Godzilla, but then I realized that,
say, next year, there won't be really long lines for the new "Star
Wars" movie.  The bonding, formative experience of standing in a long
line to buy tickets to a Star Wars movie will have been done away with
by the modern multiplex, which can show Ewan McGregor making light
saber sounds every hour, has killed the line.  Sometimes old things are
better.

Title
Review for Jackal, The (1997)
I recall this article in the NYT Magazine.  It was about the lack of
villains Hollywood can rely on.  After World War Two, they could show
Nazis in film: instant bad guy, especially with those spiffy Gestapo
uniforms.  Similarly, we had American Indians in Westerns, another
group that can be readily identified by appearance or accent.  Now,
with the advent of political sensibilities, and with the long distances
we are from World War Two, it's a bit hard to come up with readily
identifiable villains.  The article noted that Arabs have been used a
few times, then South American drug dealers, and before the bubble
economy burst, the Japanese.  We no longer have a consistently reliable
national villain, but must make do with a changing cast of ethnic or
professional types.  The Chinese may be next year's flavor, given the
random political tensions, as well as Hollywood's antipathy towards the
PRC.  I imagine a day when we can safely and seriously show the Cold
War science fiction film, Battle Beneath the Earth, in which the Red
Chinese dig tunnels under America, and start sprinkling atom bombs
under the US Heartland.  Surely a metaphor of insidious Communists.
But for now, it's only really fit for Mystery Science Theatre.
Among the flavors of recent years is the Russian Mob.  In this updated
version of "Day of the Jackal", the assassin's paymaster is a mobster
out to revenge his brother's death at the hands of the Russian Militia
and the American FBI.  But the principal villain, Bruce Willis, is
known more for his technocratic efficiency at assassinations, not for
ideological fervor.  He's a contract killer, belonging to no cause
beyond his own enrichment, a member of no ethnic identity save perhaps
a bland Western cosmopolitanism.  In contrast, the hero, Richard Gere,
is described as a fiery nationalist, a former IRA sharpshooter.  He
doesn't rely on technology to do the job -- he in fact gives up a laser
sniper scope at one point and relies on old-fashioned optics -- but is
carried through by passion and conviction.  Despite the current vogue
in creating folk heroes out of the IRA, I find it interesting that a
positive symbol of nationalist fervor is placed in contrast to the cold
blooded and rootless professional.  Technocrats aren't in favor.
In any case, I saw "The Jackal" this morning.  The original film
featured an assassination attempt on Charles de Gaulle.  But times hav
changed: the music has been updated to a Nine Inch Nails-influenced
soundtrack, and the target of the assassination is an American.
Arguably, people here in the US wouldn't care all too much if a
Frenchman is blown to bits.  I haven't seen the original movie, but I
suspect this new film features more spiffy electronics than the
original, simultaneously violating the Iron Law of Bandwidth (think
full motion video on a cell modem) and fulfilling our expectations that
computers shown by Hollywood will be miraculous beasts.
Oh, in reaction to a complentary lack of good sense about Heavily Armed
Bad Guys that we saw in, say, "Starship Troopers" (i.e., the bugs have
claws, but we'll just run right into them), let me note that when you
have a gun the size of a sofa pointed at you, the sensible thing is to
get really close to it, perhaps ducking under it or walking to one
side, as it can't hit you then.  One of the characters failed to follow
this somewhat obvious idea.
Another thing the Jackal does is the "you're about to die, so I'll tell
you the plan."  It's not as direct or obvious as a James Bond
supervillain, but it's there.  Along with a Monster that Wouldn't Die
moment.  As well as extraneous killing -- especially considering that
he's a professional assassin who shouldn't leave too much of a track --
just to show what kind of bad ass he is.  But I don't think I'll spoil
anything mentioning this.
But it's not a horrible movie.  It's reasonably good, though meant more
for video tape than $8 in a theatre.  See it at matinee.
Oh, Richard Gere's barogue is really strong at first, but then becomes
barely noticeable.  This is odd, since the film was most likely shot
out of order.

Title
Review for Smoke Signals (1998)

"Smoke Signals" is one of those small movies I may not have seen on
my own.  There was the potential dopiness factor ("the first film made
by Native Americans" or something like that).  The expectation of a
more mediocre "Boyz in the Hood" would have been high: overblown praise
for a film about an ethnic group, made by someone from that ethnic
group, simply for those facts and not because it's a remarkable movie.
White liberal guilt as a marketing tactic.
[Speaking of Native Americans and spin aimed right at white liberal
guilt, I recall the fur industry taking up the tactic of using Eskimos
to go and hunt seals for fur.  Traditional lifestyle, it was called,
even though seals had not been hunted in such numbers and solely for
fur.  In white liberal guilt terms, this caused a short circuit kind of
like the ones you see in bad science fiction, where the all-knowing
computer is defeated by the hero posing an unanswerable question.
"Does not compute" and all that because of "fur or traditional
lifestyles".  It was supposed to have been one of the reasons for fur's
revival in the past few years.  But I think I saw the article in the
New Republic.  For all I know, Stephen Glass wrote it.]
Anyway, "Smoke Signals" is based on the collection of short stories,
"The Long Ranger and Tonto Fistfight in Heaven," by Sherman Alexie, who
also did the screenplay for the movie.  The book was recommended to me
a number of times, but I never got around to reading it.  I'll pick it
up in the near future after seeing the film.
It's a good film, funny and humane.  The basic story is of the main
characters traveling from Idaho to Arizona to retrieve the body of
one their fathers.  He had left home a decade before, leaving behind
his wife and 12-year old son.  The son, of course, had not been
reconciled his father's departure.  The movie is a road movie and a
father-son-relationship movie (one that, refreshingly, doesn't involve
being lost in space or dinosaurs to work out the conflict).  It uses
universal themes, textured with Indian reservation culture to give it
context and place.
Reservation culture, despite the film's advanced billing, is not shoved in
your face.  Yes, the film shows the culture's quirks and peculiarities,
its humor and tragedy, but it does not call attention to itself.
It's simply there.
There are nice scenes illustrating the characters reactions to America's
perception of Native Americans in general.  They are conscious of it,
but look at it with unforced humor.  The film itself is an attempt to
recast this image, but it does it without straying into the New Age goo
you see strewn all over "Dances With Wolves" like buffalo droppings.
It is conscious of the image, but realizes that it has to deal with the
living in the present.
Most of the film proceeds nicely, feeling much like, say, a Jarmusch
film, but it breaks down somewhat about fifteen minutes before the end.
There is a crisis in which one of the characters has to run 20 miles
for help.  The run is very abrupt, and, apparently during his marathon,
he is magically reconciled with his father.  How this happens is clouded
in mystery: we see him running in the desert night, intercut with scenes
of fire.  There's a voice over, replaying things said earlier in the film.
At the end of the run, all is happy.  Perhaps he went on a Spirit Quest.
Arguably, if engaging in a lot of cardiovascular activity results in a
mystical voyage of inner discovery, I may someday discover the meaning of
life while on the exercise bike (in the meantime, I have wacky ideas like,
hey, hook me up to a Gilligan's Island-style bike-powered generator,
and I can power my halogen lamp for ten minutes).  Beyond this glich,
this is a good movie, and should be appearing at the local art house in
the near future.
"The court determined that Fox TV does not impede free and fair
competition in the teen-angst soap-com genre, therefore Party of Five
need not be broken into five 'Parties of One,' one being distributed to
each of the other networks."
-- 
"The court determined that Fox TV does not impede free and fair
competition in the teen-angst soap-com genre, therefore Party of Five
need not be broken into five 'Parties of One,' one being distributed to
each of the other networks."

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
The local video store is doing a rent-one-DVD-rent-second-free thing
this month, and I picked up Gattaca as the bonus movie last week,
having missed it when it was in theaters.
Intelligent science fiction films, where the focus is on the play of
ideas rather than wizbang special effects of aliens, is a rare thing.
Gattaca follows in the tradition of Blade Runner rather than
Independence Day.  True, Blade Runner has dazzling visuals, but the
core of the film is the philosophical question, what does it mean to be
human?
Gattaca's particular idea, that genetic information contains much
information which may be used destructively, has timeliness.  Witness,
for example, the recently hubbub over the New York Police Department's
proposal to begin DNA sampling of everyone arrested.  Privacy advocates
note that this goes far beyond fingerprinting as identification, as
genetic information may contain confidential medical information.  This
is perhaps how the filmmakers envision their dystopia coming about:
baby steps down a slippery slope.
The plot of the movie concerns the efforts of Vincent to pass himself
off as Jerome.  Vincent is freeborn, conceived without the benefit of
genetic tinkering to, say, remove a tendency for heart problems or
learning disorders.  Jerome is the result of such extensive
manipulation, gifted with the genes of high intelligence, physical
performance, and slicked back hair.  He, unfortunately, broke his back,
and is confined to a wheelchair.  He sells his identity to Vincent,
literally his body, as identity consists of blood and urine samples,
flakes of dandruff and loose hair, all carefully drawn and placed where
snoops may find it.
Vincent's ultimate goal is to travel in space.  All the effort to
disguise himself as Jerome goes towards getting into Gattaca, some sort
of future space agency in which only the genetically perfect are
selected.  The bulk of the film shows the plot starting to unravel, as
someone is murdered on Gattaca's premises and Vincent leaves an eyelash
in the wrong place.
This is a stylized, designed future, a vision of the world as decorated
by Hugo Boss.  The geneticall perfect were well-tailored suits, the
offices are quiet, sleek temples of efficiency.  Space travel here does
not involve the sensible application of duct tape in the right places,
but well-apportioned dabs of hair gel for that perfect look.  Yes, the
film goes out of the way to emphasize the dominance of style and look
in this world.
Actually, one nice style effect is the garb of the detectives
investigating the case.  The long gray coats and fedoras suggest the
1930s, when Fascism was at its high tide, and genetic discrimination
more acceptable.  This sort of style is also somewhat embodied in the
cars, and the look of the high end night clubs.
Well, there are some flaws.  The, uh, cosmetic flaws include the
unnoticed necessary condition of the main character looking like, say,
Ethan Hawke, instead of looking like, say, me.  Ethan Hawke can pass
himself off as a genetically scuplted uebermensch to Gattaca Human
Resources and Uma Thurman; I doubt I can.  While there may not be a
gene for the human spirit, Our Hero wouldn't have gotten far without
looking good in the thousand dollar suit.
There are nice touches to the film, touches that add credibility to
this world, a necessity for science fiction.  One is the Genetic
LoveTest, sort of like http://www.lovetest.com, but where you enter
hair or saliva samples instead of Zodiac signs.  Yes, genetic testing
trickling down to the advertisement-supported mass market.  True, the
filmmakers were trying to convey how twisted this society is by having
this sort of genetic assay be par for the course, but I just liked the
furtive, cyberpunk grungy seediness of the whole thing.
For the larger issues, I'm of two minds about the films portrayal of
genetic discrimination.  Many of the traits mentioned in the film,
especially the positive ones, may well have tendencies because of
genetics, but they are also strongly influenced by environment.  A
tendency for lung cancer may only be expressed if that person smoked.
Some gene for musical talent won't matter one jot if that person
mangled his hand in some childhood accident.  Contingencies of the
environment matter.  More strongly, genes are carriers of evolutionary
information, and nothing more.  We know very clearly that they do not
constitute the entire person.  I have doubts that any reasonable
society would ignore this.
I also don't have serious problems with using genetics to correct clear
biological problems, like diabetes or tendencies for breast cancer.
Genetic technology, like most technologies, can be used for both good
and evil.  It's up to the culture using it to determine that
congenitcal heart defects are something to be addressed, while hair
color is not.
Perhaps I have more faith in such matters than I should.  Culture cuts
both ways.  Even primitive assays can be used for what we would call
evil purposes.  Consider China's shortfall of baby girls, because the
culture places prominence on firstborn sons.  Simple miotic fluid
assays are sufficient to cause this deficit, to say nothing of
sophisiticated genetic tests.
Arguably, this is the practice of leaving babies on the mountaintop
made more precise.  Interestingly, the filmmakers, on one of the DVD
extras, seem to claim that once the Human Genome Project is complete,
we will begin to control our own evolution.  This is clearly wrong:
we've been controlling our own evolution since the beginnings of
civilization, as natural selection no longer really applies.  Culture
has a long shadow.
The film also trips lightly past the issue of remediation after birth.
It appears that all of medical technology has wilted away in favor of
genetic intervention during conception (for that matter, detective
works seems to have suffered a similiar wilting, but that's a plot
matter rather than a thematic one).  Treating, say, heart murmers with
surgery, or high cholesterol with diet and exercise  seems to have
slipped everyone's mind.  This blindness to what medical technology
should be able to do in this world is symptomatic of the pure focus on
genetic consequences.
The DVD, which, unfortunately, I only had for one night, has a
selection of "lost" scenes, which were cut for pacing or thematic
reasons.  In particular, the "Coda" sequence -- over a starry
background text noting that the Human Genome Project is nearing
completion, and that many of the Most Interesting People of the
Millennium had genetic defects -- was thankfully, tactfully cut.  The
filmmakers perhaps realized that they were approaching serious overkill
by whipping out the central theme and repeatedly slapping the audience
with it.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
This movie works on so many levels!  There are elements of that Kevin
Costner-meets-Lakota movie ("Star Trek 9: Dances with Llamas"), a whiff
of Pennsylvania Dutch chic ("Star Trek 9: Dances with Amish"), all
suffused with old-fashioned Vermont hippie-commune idealism (well, at
least before the sellout).  It's an amalgam of all these, but set in
northern California.  Yes, the crew of the Enterprise-E, after long
voyages of discovery and galactic adventure, has found a bunch of
technologically advanced people who enjoy living their immortal lives
as dirt farmers, and have been doing so for centuries.
Yup.  Don't let the warmly lit, Italian-rural-style dining fool you
(dining scenes themselves taken from the "American|Brit in Villa For
Summer" genre, therefore "Star Trek 9: A Starship With A View").  Those
poeple, while they have not yet evolved into pure energy, know all
about warp technology, positronic brains and quilt-making.
Unfortunately, they wrote down their nuclear-weapons technology on a
napkin and lost it, so when it came time to "kick Son'a ass", all they
have are sticks with rusty nails in them.  We'd otherwise have a much
shorter film, giving back to us ninety minutes of lives.  We could have
used those extra ninety minutes to contemplate the benefits of a
simpler, rustic life.  I suppose that in taking this opportunity for
contemplation away from us and instead subjecting us to this movie, the
filmmakers have betrayed their own vision of paradise.
I suppose I should explain why nuclear weapons would have been needed.
Bad guys, led by F. Murray Abraham (oh, how far he's fallen: I saw
"Amadeus" recently on DVD, and what a wonderful Salieri he was.  Now,
he's simply the pathetic New Face of Evil.) in cahoots with the
Federation, have decided to steal the secret of Amish immortality.
They come up with this wacky plan involving holodecks and a trail of
breadcrumbs to trick the Amish to their reservation.  The offer of
casino rights apparently wasn't contemplated.  Picard, through a series
of humorous accidents and chance encounters, discovers the wacky plan
and sets out to foil it.  He also gets laid in the process.  (Oh, we
now have proof that Picard was born bald (well, you know what I mean):
bathed in age-reversing metaphasic radiation, his scalp budges not an
inch).  Of course, the Enterprise crew is successful, the rustic
paradise is saved, and Disney acquires rights to build a theme park on
the other side of the planet, Bed-and-Breakfast Land.
The other amusing tidbits: you can fly the Enterprise with a pop-up
joystick on the bridge.  This ain't no fancy Thrustmaster-type
joystick.  It's one of the nasty ones that come with your computer if
you buy it at Bob's Bait and PC Shack, the ones that get your X-Wing
creamed by those TIE fighters on Mission 4.  Riker got to use the
joystick (and had the bubblebath scene with Troi) 'cause he's the
director.  I have the impression that Riker was as screwed as the
hypothetical X-Wing player (not me, I suck at those games), because the
"fire phasers" trigger wasn't working.  If it did, it would have saved
many more minutes of movie.
There are actually lines of dialog that invoke Gilbert and Sullivan in
what would ordinarily be a tense, bad special effects-laden situation.
There are other lines of dialog that refer to breast size.  Boggle.
If I were the actors on Deep Space 9 or Voyager, I'd be pissed at the
whole movie-making apparatus over at Paramount.  To think, the studio
bigwigs may flush the franchise down the crapper before they get their
turn at making movies.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
So, in the wee early morning hours of Monday (well, not that early),
while having my breakfast cereal, I see in the newspaper that "Austin
Powers" has utterly crushed "Star Wars" this weekend.  Ah, well, it's
definitely a funnier film.
Uttering "Austin Powers" and "Star Wars" in the same breath isn't an
outlandish thing.  "Austin Powers" had at least a few "Star Wars"
references, from its advertising campaign to the opening text crawl.
We can take it a bit further, and say that Dr. Evil is, like, the
lightsabre duel, Austin himself was sort of like the Pod Race, and no
one was Jar Jar Binks.  Well, I could have done with less Fat Bastard,
but I don't think, Fat Bastard Die Die Die.  "Austin Powers" is a very
consistently funny movie, without many soft spots.  Some things go on
for too long, like your typical SNL skit, but not many.
What plot there is centers on Dr. Evil going back in time to steal
Austin's mojo.  This is basically an excuse to wander into all sorts of
shameless product placements, the most inspired of which is the one for
the new Volkswagen Beetle; psychedelic Sixties theme park fun with
Heather Graham in short-shorts; and some very neat jokes with clueless,
displaced Sixties personalities who have seen the future but have now
been sent back to their home turf.  Dr. Evil trying and badly failing
to use late 1990s-isms was inspired ("One hundred billion dollars!"), a
sort of conscious set of reversals from the usual man-out-of-time
idioms.  Austin himself was less interesting in this regard.
I'm starting to think that cultural critics of the 21st Century will
recognize Jerry Springer as a brilliant auteur, conjuring forth a
subtle performance art piece on a daily basis, casting it as a lewd
talk show in order for his devastating social criticism of fin-de-siecle
America to reach the widest audience in the most subversive way
possible.  But I could be wrong.  I've only watched one of his shows,
when I was on sick leave last year.
I actually didn't like the original movie all that much.  It plodded
along: once you get the idea of spy movie-spoof guys from the 1960s
trying to make it thirty years later, you have a lot of the joke.
That's material for half-hour sitcoms (South Park actually had a
wonderful episode of this, with an ice man from 1996 being revived in
1999: Land's End, Ace of Base, and the Internet was difficult to get
on), not feature-length films.  This new movie just works better by not
paying much attention to that idea, by self-consciously pointing out
how silly the movie is ("It's remarkable how much the English
countryside looks like southern California", and the London street
scene with sun-burnt hills in the background), and by playing with the
aforementioned man-out-of-time-back-in-time jokes.
Oh, stay for the entire credits.  Little skits in the credits.  And the
DVD for this movie _must_, absolutely _must_ have karaoke.

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)

Looking it up on the IMDB, I think the only Sam Raimi movies I've seen
are "Darkman", "Army of Darkness", and the Sharon Stone western, "The
Quick and the Dead."  Except for "Army", I've missed the Evil Dead
movies that first put him on the map.  The strongest impression of
Raimi, though, comes more from "Hercules" and "Xena", if only because
Ted Raimi and Bruce Campbell are regulars.  Much clever goofiness in
these shows.
I finally got around to seeing Raimi's "A Simple Plan" this weekend,
and you can't easily travel further in tone from "Xena" or "Army of
Darkness."  Here we have a moral fable, where reasonable decisions made
by decent folk lead down a path where decency is thrown out for the
sake of fear and greed, and where small, innocent choices spiral out of
control.  While good luck may be the reside of good design, the film
plays out a converse, with a simple plan contorting into disaster in
the face of accident and unforeseen consequences.
The basic plot is the story of a trio of friends who stumble on a lot
of money.  They decide to keep the windfall from themselves, even
though the circumstances look suspicious.  They have to hide it, for a
while at least, or questions will be asked.  We've seen this before,
but Raimi and his actors handle these familiar parts very well.
A recent, similar film is the British "Shallow Grave", where three
flatmates fall into a bundle of cash when their new boarder dies.  Not
a bad film, it is more a cautionary tale about the effective disposal
of unwanted corpses and why people may want hacksaws in the big city:
it's a body dumping black comedy.  While there's the familiar flavor of
desperate greed and paranoia in the film, the main difference is that
the people from "Shallow Grave" are all heartless urban assholes
(clearly shown in the first 5 minutes) whose ultimate fates you don't
particularly care about, while "A Simple Plan" features rural workers
scraping by meagerly, carrying believeable hopes and memories.
Skin-deep yuppies living in the present, whose windfall only increases
the degree of skin-deep yuppism, or ordinary folk with histories and
futures, for whom the cash is a desperately transforming experience:
which makes for the more better story?
I don't want to talk too much about the plot, mainly because there's a
certain pleasure in seeing it unfold, seeing how the innocuous choices
lead to treacherous ground, which leads to even worse choices.
Instead, I'll reassure you that the early animal metaphors, which seem
overly heavy and obvious, really do figure in the plot later.  They
don't exist in a vacuum, even if the whole fox in the henhouse thing
really is a laying it on a bit thick.  It's a fine film.

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)

Despite deep, deep misgivings about "Dark City", from how bad the TV
commericals look after the seriously cool theater trailers, and from
word of mouth, I went to see the movie last night and was surprised.
It didn't totally suck; it wasn't totally cheesy.
This is a science fiction/fantasy/horror film that aspires to art.  The
visions this film presents gets up there -- it's very pretty, with the
fish being released into the water merely being the first of many
elegant images -- but the writing fails here and there, and then breaks
down completely near the end.  The writers, whether through a failure
of talent or through a cave-in to a producer's low opinion of the
audience, try to explain everything in agonizing, repetitive detail,
far worse than "Blade Runner" with the voice-over.  Mysteries are
solved and removed before they have a chance to be savored and
revealed.
It's also not a completely original piece of work.  The film concerns a
man who wakes up in a hotel room, with his memories gone.  It's an old
plot, though, the twist here is to make his quest to regain memory into
a meditation on the idea of memory and identity.  Philip K. Dick has
done this any number of times, usually better.  While a less pretty and
less serious film than "Dark City", the PKD inspired "Total Recall"
perhaps makes for a better meditation on memory and identity if you
ignore the Schwarzenneger pyrotechnics.  We won't get into PKD's
stories or the intensely literary and just-as-elegantly-shot "Blade
Runner".
There are a few moments when the film wanders into stupidity, but
generally not fatally.  At one point, a character is informed of his
god-like powers of shaping reality.  He uses the powers to make a beach
-- a lame one -- instead of, say, building temples and calling on the
people to cast golden calves in his honor.  (That's what I'd do.  I
suppose I shouldn't achieve god-like powers.)  Oh, the god-like powers
are expressed by a woo-woo-woo-woo rings coming from out of foreheads.
Awe-inspiring, this isn't.  Actually, thinking about it, I'm not sure
how god-like the powers are, since the evil-people have them, and they
work in labor-intensive ways, either in Dickensian infernal mills or as
roadies in a mysterious rigging company.  They also have to get very
close to mere mortals in order to put them to sleep (in a
less-lame-than-expected gesture of the hand and a slinkily spoken
"sleep" -- it looked really good in the trailer, since you're hearing
only industrial-like music, but looks really bad in the commercials
since you can hear them talking)
The bad guys are "derivative" or "refers to", depending on if you're in
a good mood or not.  The Strangers seem to be inspired by the old
silent film "Nosferatu".  Except for pointy teeth, they're dead ringers
for the first on-screen vampire, complete with bald head and
out-of-proportion limbs.  There is something deliciously creepy about
these figures carrying knives and wearing cheerily malevolent smiles.
Yes, some of the good photography in "Dark City" may be inspired by
Expressionist films, though any movie scenes featuring tall, lean
figures in the shadows may be references to that style.
The art design for the film -- the costumes, the cars, the props (which
looked like models, actually) -- borrows from the 1930s, arguably the age
of totalitarianism, though that wasn't made explicit (which, given how
much they like to explain everything, was missed by the writers).  The
issues of identity and control certainly has totalitarian implications,
though my main thought was, how did people in the 1930s avoid hat hair?
One question for the audience: when did clocks acquire mystical
significance?  The film's production company is in fact called "Mystery
Clock" -- a good name -- but mechanical clocks didn't exist until a
few hundred years ago.  The idea of the mystery clock hasn't been with
us forever.  Cinderella focuses on the stroke of midnight, but when did
this motif come about?  The story is older than clocks.
Oh, one thing they might have done, which would've been cute, would've
been to put a couple pair of elephants standing on a big turtle in a
particular scene.  You'll know which it is.

Title
Review for Third Man, The (1949)
It's unclear what I can possibly add to what's already been said -- and
said better -- about this film.  While "The Third Man" doesn't have the
single line "one and only" review from Pauline Kael attached to it, it
certainly is up there among the acknowledged masterworks from the
1940s, and it has certainly been commented on.
Since it's now the 1990s, Film Forum is presenting "The Third Man" for
a 50th Anniversary run (http://www.filmforum.com/3rdman.html).  This is
the somewhat longer British version.  The difference is about eleven
minutes and an introductory voice-over from the director.  I've seen
this film -- the American version -- once before but it was a long time
ago, when I was at Berkeley.  If I remember correctly, it was shown as
part of a not particularly interesting class on existentialism (such
classes are sometimes there for those who aren't sure of what they're
in school for, I think) (we also saw "Hiroshima, Mon Amour" and "Woman
of the Dunes").  I was probably in the process of dropping out of
graduate school at the time, and my recollection of the film is
somewhat fuzzy, more a remembrance of certain images, bits of plot and
Orson Welles's celebrated entrance than anything else.  I can't tell
you where the differences between versions are.
Briefly, the plot involves a naive American writer arriving in postwar
Vienna to see an old friend.  Upon arriving, he finds that his friend
is dead: he was hit by a car while crossing the street a few days
before.  Because parts of the story don't add up -- initially, he
simply doesn't believe the police when they say his old friend ran in
vicious circles; later, he learns that there was a mysterious third man
at the accident site -- he begins investigating the circumstances of
the death.  He becomes entangled in the Viennese underworld as he digs
deeper, and is attracted to his friend's girlfriend, Anna.
The film winds through like a long nightmare, complete with absurd
incidents and the incongruous zither music.  This is how it should be;
the plot, after all, has the familiar nightmare of arriving someplace
and finding the world upside down.  The film's dreamscape is a ruined
Vienna, the skyline with the spiral of the Stephansdom visible but
pockmarked (http://info.wien.at/e/mus/mus02081.htm), piles of rubble
everywhere, skeletons of buildings appearing all too frequently,
prominent inhabitants who don't quite achieve normalcy, and bystanders
who watch and stare.  And this is merely daylight, above ground
Vienna.  We also see a nighttime Vienna of long, Expressionist shadows,
surreal chases, weirdly lit sewers, and Orson Welles's entrance
underneath an accidental shaft of light.  All these things in the film
are tuned perfectly.
This world of "The Third Man" is a surreal one of arbitrary forces --
the confused authority of the governing Allied Armies is the most
visible example -- where moral choices are made in an ethical vacuum.
Much is gray, from the evil Harry Lime showing a light side in helping
Anna, to the crusader Calloway using others as tools for emotional
manipulation.  This ambiguous morality is solely created by one's
self.  And I suppose this is why the film was shown with that
Existentialism class.

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)

"Run Lola Run" ("Lola Rennt") is the neat little high-energy German
film playing in art houses right now.  The movie has many pluses,
mainly having to do with its energy content and some funny sequences,
as well as some neat visual tricks, but it's somewhat less than it
first appears.
The film is apparently about how contingency affects and effects the
courses of our lives.  The basic plot is that Lola's boyfriend Manni
needs, in 20 minutes, to come up with 100,000 marks he owes a violent
gangster, or else he's dead.  She rushes out to save him by coming up
with the money, running across Berlin.  The same events unfold three
times, each time a little different because, apparently, of the
circumstances of an encounter she has with a dog on the way down the
stairs.  Events unfold differently not just for her but also for
various people she bumps into along the way.  It's the idea of the
butterfly effect on human histories.
"Run Lola Run" is full of energy: there are the running scenes of the
title as she races from place to place, all accompanied by a good
techno soundtrack.  There are few pauses.  The only ones of length are
the interludes between iterations, where the love between Lola and
Manni is fleshed out.  The movie also has a nice sense of humor, with
how several of the random encounters play out.  The cartoons were neat,
too, and I got to find out how little I remember from my college German
classes.  But the heart of the movie is about alternative histories.
One trick that's received notice is the alternate histories of the
people Lola bumps into on her run.  Yes, the point of such divergent
histories arising from whether they're bumped into or narrowly avoided
is the notion that we're all connected by webs of contingency.  A
momentary delay because we missed the walk light may hurl our lives off
in entirely different paths.  Yes, but only in the case of spectacular
accidents, both bad (hit by bus) or good (chance first encounter with
the love of your life).  (I'm under the impression "Sliding Doors"
plays thoroughly with this idea of the split second contingency, though
I haven't seen the movie.  I believe there was also a Kieslowski film
about missing a train along these lines.)  Generally, the momentum of
lives are sufficient so that their trajectories will not be upset by
whether someone brushes by you on the sidewalk or clears you by a good
foot.  These little episodes lack any compelling sense of causality and
exist in a flash-lit vacuum of the filmmaker's imaging.  Why does the
guy on the bike start shooting drugs instead of just saying no, and why
would the permutations of his trivial encounter with Lola send him down
one path and not the other?  The philosophical point about
connectedness contained in the film has the lightweight feel of what a
bright, young college student spins out in a late night conversation
over beer and cigarettes: the apparent heft of the point dissipates in
the light of day.
There's Lola's particular situation, where the causal elements that
determine how each iteration turns out is given more play.  This is
more satisfying to watch, but I feel it's less about little contingent
circumstances affecting how events unfold, and more about how Lola
"solves" the puzzle pieces to make events unfold in the best possible
way (for her).  The caught-in-temporal-loop episodes from Star Trek do
this sort of thing routinely: a certain sequence of actions have to be
undertaken before the whole thing is solved, and the Enterprise escapes
into next week.  And, of course, there's "Groundhog Day".
In some sense, Lola is a less aware version of the Bill Murray
character.  She knows that events have turned out wrong, and she
"corrects" them by force of will and the use of a "play over" button.
The interludes between the iterations that show her love of Manni give
reason for her using her will in this manner.  In a sense, there's no
contingency at all: we know Lola is going to succeed in saving Manni
and herself.

Title
Review for Trekkies (1997)
There was a late episode from "Star Trek: The Next Generation" which
had the new Enterprise crew rescue Scotty from the old series.  Through
the course of this episode, Scotty gets homesick, and, through the
magic of the holodeck, he visits the bridge of the old Enterprise and
reminisces over a bottle of Romulan ale (or somesuch).
I'm told that this old Enterprise bridge was borrowed from a Star Trek
fan club: the fan club actually went and built the bridge in precise
detail, and Paramount found it easier to rent it than build their own.
I'm surprised this story didn't make it into the documentary,
"Trekkies".  It would have fit in, alongside the stories of the
15-year-old fan whose club is making a movie -- he's doing the special
effects on his PC -- or the dentist who dresses up as a Star Fleet
officer to see his patients (and has his receptionists and assistants
dress in uniform, also).  Or, for that matter, with the Whitewater
juror who came to court every day in her Commander's uniform.  Such is
the energy and zeal being unleashed on things Star Trek by its fans,
and spilling out into the mainstream world.
I have to admit that I can identify an undisclosed number of Star Trek
episodes given only a five-second sample, but not all of them, and
probably not the majority from ST:DS9 or ST:V.  I have never worn
Vulcan ears and remain horrified by the "Q Virus" story from
"Trekkies".  As a more casual fan, seeing all this wackiness from more
ardent fans is a treat:  there's sufficient familiarity with the milieu
to identify with much of the more extreme behavior, and to be surprised
in a good way by the creative ways fan devotion is expressed.  Yes, I
know that Commander Sisko shaved his head and grew a goatee midway
through the series, but would I have imagined that a fan would take the
Sisko action figure, file off its plastic hair and paint a little
goatee on it?
And Star Trek is a positive force, with notions of public service
deeply embedded in its vision of the future (for an interesting
discussion, take a look at this Salon article:
http://www.salonmag.com/ent/movies/feature/1999/06/15/brin_main/index.html).
This moral vision has not been lost on its fans.  The woman who wore
the Commander's uniform to the Whitewater jury, for example, heads up a
local fan club, and her reasoning for wearing the uniform is that the
fan club is dedicated to community service, and what better represents
civic duty than serving on a jury?  The uniform is merely the visible
symbol of this ideal of service.  Indeed, the idea of community service
crops up here and there among the fans highlighted in "Trekkies", from
the aforementioned Commander to the local Klingon crew.  The dentist
who dresses up in uniform is just trying to make his patients feel
better -- the hokey transporter set up over the dentist's chair is
meant to transport the patient away from the root canal procedure.
Overall, Star Trek has been a positive influence, whether as a spark
for individual creativity or as a larger framework for public
consciousness.  There can be worse things than being a Trekkie.
So, is there a real difference between the story of Babe Ruth visiting
sick kids in the hospital and Kate Mulgrew, Capt. Janeway from ST:V,
doing the same?  Both are indulging the passions of their fans, giving
them a chance to feel a bit better in their illnesses.  Baseball and
other sports are more revered and accepted than Star Trek by the
mainstream -- we don't give weird and slightly disgusted looks to
people who know who won the Cy Young in 1966, and we think the guys who
paint their bodies in the team's colors and stand half naked in subzero
weather are just jolly clowns -- but it's just a particular pastime,
hobby or passion.  [A Userfriendly cartoon has nice swipe at this
silly bias:
http://www.userfriendly.org/cartoons/archives/99may/19990516.html]
"Trekkies" is a good documentary, but like most documentaries, it
doesn't get much screen time.  In New York, it's currently playing at
the local 2nd-run movie house (known as the $3-movie theater in a city
where the average ticket is $9) without having actually made it to the
first-run houses.  A pity: it's worth it for both fans and non-fans to
see Trek followers at their most ardent, and see that, while their
behavior may appear kooky or extreme, it's not really a bad thing, all
things considered.

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)

My purgatory for watching "Godzilla" -- and dragging friends along with
me -- has come to an end this week.  Not only did I see the wacky
French existentialist film with two minutes of motorcycle action and
rioting poets this past weekend ("Orpheus"), I also watched one of the
funniest movies I've seen in a long, long time, "Something About
Mary."  We'll ignore "Armageddon"-as-comedy.
"Something About Mary" is a great screwball romantic comedy starring
Matt Dillon, Ben Stiller, Chris Elliot and, as the luminescent Mary,
Cameron Diaz.  The film opens in high school, early 1980s, with an
awfully nerdy Ted (Ben Stiller) -- bad hair, thick-rimmed glasses,
braced teeth and all -- about to go to the prom with Mary.  Mary is a
pure vision of light and beauty, able to bestow grace on this corrupt
old world by her mere presence.  Ted, at her house to pick her up for
the prom, uses the bathroom and has an accident with his tuxedo
zipper.  It's a shocking accident, making even hardened cops and
firemen wince when seeing it: "How did you manage to close the zipper?"
While this gag is drawn out for an amazingly long time, it maintains
its effect.  In any case, it's only two weeks in the hospital for Ted,
but no prom with Mary; she moves away the next month.
Thirteen years later, Ted still thinks about Mary, and hires Pat,
played by Matt Dillon, a part time private investigator, to find her in
Miami.  He does, but is utterly smitten with her.  Pat lies to Ted,
describing Mary as 250lbs of paraplegic trailer trash, then moves to
Miami, where he creates a false identity for himself, haphazardly
constructed from eavesdropping on Mary and her friends, as they talk
about what they're looking for in men: a worldly architect, with ties
to Nepal, able to be kind to Mary's mentally challenged brother,
Warren.  In the meantime, Ted realizes that he's been lied to, and
heads down to Florida to see Mary.
Yes, the stalking themes are blatant in this movie (though, you know,
with the Web, we have things like the Cameron Diaz Internet Shrine,
http://www.geocities.com/~camerondiaz/shrine.html).  There's also an
extremely violent fight with a dog on speed, public masturbation, a
prison scene with a huge cell-mate, references to serial killing and
the wonderful, glorious Buttercup song, all done with cleverness and
care.  The Farrelly Brothers, who wrote and directed the film -- they
also did "Dumb and Dumber" and "King Pins", but don't hold it against
them -- basically string a series of very funny episodes into the
story, some pushing the boundaries of good taste.  1990s Woody Allen
this ain't.  Some are wonderful, almost wordless set pieces of physical
comedy, true ROTFL material.  They have their timing dead on, and the
cast is wonderful.  Ben Stiller makes you care about Ted (I had braces,
bad hair in high school), and Cameron Diaz makes Mary into a vision.
I've actually only seen her in "The Mask" before, but she's fantastic.
Thinking a bit about Ben Stiller, this is a better film than "Flirting
With Disaster", with him, Patricia Arquette and Tea Leoni.  Not quite
the semi-serious theme of questing for one's identity, one's roots --
"Mary" is pure romantic comedy after all -- but just funnier.  The
Farrelly's take more liberties with reality, coming up with more
bizarre scenarios as the film goes on, and they get away with it.
Oh, part of the film was filmed in Providence, RI.  The Farrelly
Brothers are apparently from there.  I actually thought some of the
scenes were at Harvard Square, but what do I know?  Brown U. folks may
be pleased.
Since this was part of that film class thing, there were interviews.
Actually, two of them, before and after the movie.  Before the movie,
we had Steve Buscemi, talking a bit about "Armageddon", and then Ben
Stiller.  I was hoping for Cameron Diaz, but, alas.
Buscemi was talking about the casting process for "Armageddon": they
had the Rockhound role sort of ready for him, and, after he signed on,
tailored it to be a Buscemi character.  He said he signed the day after
buying a Brooklyn brownstone.  Other trivia included talking about the
premiere party at NASA, Cape Canaveral, where they got Aerosmith to
perform.  This party probably cost much more than "Tree's Lounge".  As
he noted, big films have certain perks, like meeting astronauts and
walking underneath the space shuttle as it was being prepped for launch
("Don't touch!").  The "Armageddon" shoot was 6-months, with a lot of
his time spent waiting around.  This diverged into a brief discussion
of how important scheduling is for film making, especially a picture as
large as this.  There was a "Reservoir Dogs" note, also: Mr. Blue,
Edward Bunker, was an ex-con -- armed robbery -- who became a novelist
in later life.  He did informal technical advice for "Dogs".  I don't
remember what Mr. Blue looks like.
Ben Stiller talked a bit about his career, and a bit about shooting
"Mary".  The trivia included the dog fight scene.  He apparently spent
a good part of one day with a fake dog attached to his crotch.  When
they said, "Action!", he's start spinning around, screaming.  When they
said, "Cut!", he'd stop, and wait around for the next sequence, still
with the dog attached to his crotch.  They also had to sing "Buttercup"
at the end of every scene: the outtakes from this was used in the end
credits.  It's a wonderful way to cap off the film.

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
Basically, "Last Days of Disco" sold out minutes before I got to the
movie theater.  The people right in front of me were the first ones
turned away, one of those if-I-hadn't-sat-on-my-ass-those-five-minutes
moments.  But I did want to see "The Spanish Prisoner", having liked
"House of Games" a lot when I saw it a few years ago.
"The Spanish Prisoner" is the story of a man caught in an elaborate
con, to separate him from the industrial secrets he holds.  He's the
inventor of "the Process", which will apparently allow his company to
corner the market, or something like that.  Perhaps he works for
Gilette, and what they're talking about is the new Mach 3 razor, with
three (!) blades instead of two.  Perhaps not.  It's immaterial: the
book he has, with the Process scribbled down as a jumble of nonsense
mathematics (clearly taking place in the age before computers) is the
object of this game.
David Mamet is supposed to be a master of dialog.  I thought the dialog
was remarkably annoying in this film.  He feels compelled to make his
actors repeat things, over and over again.  In "House of Games", this
trick conveys a sense of menace, of deliberate probing.  It works.  In
"Spanish Prisoner", it reminded me of a scene from "The Simpsons", in
which Bart (or Homer) approaches a moment of epiphany.  Random words
and noises sound like the thing he's trying to think of (though,
probably, if it was Homer, he got it wrong).  "Spanish Prisoner" was
like this, with the repetitions pointing to something obvious, which
the audience should have seen many, many minutes before the folks on
screen.
The ending also feels patched together.  There was another con
working.  When it started is unclear: there were no moments when,
thinking back on the film, you could have said, ah ha!  It comes out of
thin air, a deus ex machina, thorougly unexplained and unjustified.
The cons fall into two classes, then: those that are telegraphed well
in advanced, and those that come out of the blue.  Neither is
particularly satisfying.
The comparison with "House of Games" is inevitable.  There are a series
of cons throughout "House", but they all have these retrospective ah-ha
moments.  They make sense.  Cons are also seen to fail because of
contingency: someone in the wrong spot at the wrong time, etc.  The con
men are not omniscient, not omnipotent.  We seem them improvise when
things go wrong.  And they sometimes fail because of accidents.
As a bonus in "House of Games", we see some secondary cons: ways to
lift money out of an envelope, tricks you can play in a Western Union
office, the idea of a tell.  In that film, you have a feeling that
you're being let into the con man's world, a gritty place of
smoke-shrouded poker games and greasy spoon diners.  This impression
that you're seeing things you're not supposed to see is missing from
"Spanish Prisoner".  "Prisoner" plays out as a caper film of high money
and elaborate contrivances.  It's nothing in particular.
One minor plus with "Prisoner", though, is that it was apparently
filmed in my neighborhood.  They use the 79th Street IRT, and shoot a
few scenes outside the Althrop, this hulking building at 79th and
Broadway (It's apparently hollow on the inside, with a court yard.
Rich people live there.)
"The court determined that Fox TV does not impede free and fair
competition in the teen-angst soap-com genre, therefore Party of Five
need not be broken into five 'Parties of One,' one being distributed to
each of the other networks."
-- 
"The court determined that Fox TV does not impede free and fair
competition in the teen-angst soap-com genre, therefore Party of Five
need not be broken into five 'Parties of One,' one being distributed to
each of the other networks."

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)

Now that X-Files has apparently become a quirky romantic comedy, sort
of like an alien-network executive hybrid of the first season of
"Friends" and "Twilight Zone" (e.g., "in a very special episode,
because of lost time, Mulder forgets Scully's birthday..."), we have to
go elsewhere to get our grand conspiracy-paranoia fix.  Conveniently, I
was on a quest to see the Star Wars preview, and "Enemy of the State"
just seemed like the right kind of movie to have "Every Saga Has a
Beginning..." pop up beforehand.  Sadly, that particular movie theater
insisted on putting the premiere with the Brad Pitt-as-Deadhead movie
instead of making my life more convenient.  Sadly, too, the paranoia
fix just wasn't there:  low-grade stuff, not worthy of the better
conspiracy movies.
Comparisons between "Enemy of the State" and the superb Coppola film,
"The Conversation" are inevitable.  Both feature Gene Hackman as a
professional eavesdropper, both indulge in hidden cameras and listening
through tiny microphones as their central activity.  The new movie pays
homage to its predecessor in its spy-on-people-in-park sequence, for
that matter.
But the older film maintains a dark, forbidding atmosphere throughout.
There's a sense of dread.  It was released around the time of
Watergate, after all.  This new film has plenty of adrenaline scenes,
stunts that couldn't easily be staged in the 1970s, wild chases that
arguably should have made the evening news but somehow didn't.  It's
neat eye candy, but, beyond a few tossed off platitudes about watching
the watchers and all that, there's nothing there but stage smoke and
flashing lights.  One almost thinks this was deliberate.  In "The
Conversation" there's one last bit surveillance, one nasty, creepy
episode of eavesdropping at the end.  There's also a final flourish of
watching at the end of "Enemy", but it's a happy, jokey scene: Gene
Hackman is sending Will Smith his vacation pictures.  Will Smith is not
in the least freaked out by this intrusion.  I suppose that if friends
are watching you then it's really no problem at all.
Feelings of grand conspiracy are also notably absent in "Enemy".  The
bad guys are a rogue unit of the NSA, led by someone with a grudge
because he wasn't promoted to Deputy Secretary of Spy Satellites And
Men's Room Stalls, or something.  On the whole, the NSA doesn't come
off as evil, just misguided in an office or two: there's even a scene
where the NSA chief makes a point of law regarding his agencies
activities, and invoking a threat of prison time for people who might
have done bad things.  The apparatus, in this case, isn't evil; there
are merely evil men.  Quite clearly, we're no longer in the age of
Watergate, despite the current impeachment hubbub.
I think there's one other free floating film reference in "Enemy", this
time to the disappointing Wim Wenders's state surveillance film, "The
End of Violence".  Well, maybe, but that's how I thought of Gabriel
Byrne's cameo.
At least in the Wim Wenders's, the act of surveillance is supposed to
have a distancing, depersonalizing quality.  All the computer screens
allow you to watch the world but not be a part of it.  In "Enemy", the
film makers indulge in the late 1990s ops center fetish, where flashing
screens, militarily precise orders and commando tactics have a certain
testosterone-heavy flourish.  The implied attractiveness of this sort
of world undermines whatever pretense the film might have about
eavesdropping being a wrong thing.
A few random notes, to close things out.  I find it interesting that
the vast surveillance apparatus portrayed in the movie can't be used
to, say, find Scud missiles in the Iraqi desert.  Certainly, a Scud is
somewhat larger than Will Smith.  Maybe they've been able to exploit
more of that alien technology they have over in Area 51.  I only offer
that as a possibility.  As someone who works with computers all day, I
have to note that many of the computer screens portrayed in this movie
had typical Hollywood user interfaces: lots of cool looking data
scrolling by, little of it useful, all of it capable of producing mongo
eye strain.  Surely, the NSA must have a good vision care program.
Much of the surveillance footage in the opening credits, I think, has
appeared in various Fox specials, "When 7-11 Clerks Attack", or
something similar.  One may note that much of this surveillance is
courtesy of private entities, ranging from your local bank's ATM booth
to the usual 7-11 security cam, up to the almost ubiquitous Los Angeles
area news chopper.  Little of that footage was from government
entities.  Yes, the people who put the credits together wanted to send
us a message about surveillance being pervasive in our society.  Well,
maybe that's what they wanted to say.

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)

This film is a brilliant dystopia, depicting a nightmare world in which
arena football has become the national pasttime.  
The arena football motif carries through the film, where we see, over
and over again, people we'd hope would be sensible do remarkably stupid
things.
OK.  Stop.  "Starship Troopers" is based -- I use this word loosely --
on Robert Heinlein's novel of the same name.  I'm not sure about the
history of science fiction, but this novel may have been the first to
coin the phrase "bug hunt," which we see most famously in "Aliens."
It's combat science fiction, centering on the actions of soldiers from
the future, who are recognizably types from today, only with bigger,
fancier guns and spiffier uniforms.
The film picks up the plot points and the names: there's a big battle,
where the humans get their asses kick.  Then there are other battles,
and finally, this "brain bug" is captured at the end, giving the humans
the key to victory.  Woo hoo!
The film, however, is just plain empty.  It skips through the novel's
plot points, but there's very little behind it beyond a massive special
effects budget -- the animated bugs make Jurassic Park's dinos look
like something we saw in King Kong (no, wait, they were things we saw
in King Kong) -- and the soap opera antics of the gruff foot soldier,
the dashing starship pilot (who, apparently, is named "Ace"), the woman
that they love, and this other woman who pines for the GFS.
The heart of the novel is its moral vision.  You may disagree strongly
with what Heinlein thinks, but you can't say that this novel isn't
animated by his moral code.  The code is expressed in the trooper's
actions, his progress through the ranks, the lectures he receives, the
conversations he overhears and the implicit comparison between bugs and
humans.  
The film's fatal flaw is that it is entirely lacking in a moral
vision.  At most, it makes very nodding, very satirical references to
it.  No code or vision powers the film; all we have are special effects
and soap opera.  And when the protagonist finally declares that he
understands the morality of this universe, that he knows the difference
between "citizens" and "civilians", it's merely a point of melodrama, a
tying of plot threads, and a reference to a question he couldn't answer
previously.  There's no conviction.
But, the one positive thing about Starship Troopers, the movie, in the
future, will become fodder for MST3K.  To wit:
1) Where else will we "Doogie Howser, Psychic Nazi"?  Crow T. Robot
will have been saying, "Our minds are linked, your thoughts are my
thoughts..." at one point.  You'll know when.
2) The continuing mis-casting of Michael Ironside, who, once again,
plays the gruff professional soldier.  I'm sure he can play a caring,
sensitive role, if only they'd let him.  Well, maybe not.
3) The insistence of all the troopers to get in real close to the bugs,
despite the fact that they have guns, and the bugs have claws.  It's
sort of like those bad action movies, where the villan, who has a big
gun, decides that, yes, getting really close to Steven Segal is _no
problem_ -- he can't kick my gun away!
[Actually, this leads to one of the major deviations from the book --
these movie bugs apparently haven't really developed technology.  In
the novel, there are bugs with ray guns, who pilot space ships, and
they're clearly intelligent and scheming.  Humanity has an equal
opponent, and you can think of bug society as contrast and comparison
to human society.  I find this scarier, in a way, than the
must-invent-wheel-must-discover-fire bugs they have in the movie.]
4) 24th Century Technology, in which they've invented a new form of
information storage that looks remarkably like carbon copy.
5) 24th Century Music, which looks remarkably like 1980s music, but
with less hair.
6) Tug-o-war with the brain bug.  Humanity has apparently lost the
ability to manufacture the "bulldozer", and must resort to "Ten
Commandments"-like teams of rope-pullers.
7) Arena football.  Played with a silver football.  'Nuff said.
I have to credit the film with one good thing, besides the special
effects.  There was a nice reference to Fritz Lang's "Metropolis" at
the beginning.
The Internet: an empirical test of the idea that a million monkeys banging
on a million keyboards can produce Shakespeare.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
There's a moment in "The Blair Witch Project" when I had to think of
the Brady Bunch.  Perhaps I'd been primed by the main characters
singing the Gilligan's Island theme as they go off into the woods, but
there's a moment evocative of Bobby picking up the tikki doll in the
Hawaii episodes.  Bad stuff is going to happen, though maybe not with
anyone losing it on a surf board.
Despite this, "Blair Witch" does generally go against the standard
horror movie cliches.  No deadly glitter of steel reflecting off a
knife or axe, no false scares when the rattling in the woods turns out
to be a bunny, no real shocks when the false scares turns into the lull
before the storm.  The movie's frights work through the ominous buildup
of information, and suggestive noises in the night.  Little gore is
used, and what gore we do see is ambiguous.  The creepiest Lovecraft
stories I've read works similarly: much time is spent telling the dark
history of this quiet house in, say, Providence, and only then do we
venture inside.
"Blair Witch", however, and despite the hype, really isn't the scariest
movie ever made.  Or at least I didn't find it that way.  Maybe I
couldn't suspend disbelief sufficiently -- I kept thinking that this
was a problem that could have been solved with a GPS unit, a pair night
vision goggles and some clue -- and, yes, there are creepy moments with
the barely audible children's voices and the grove full of wood
figures, and the quick vision in the cellar for some reason sticks in
my mind, but I've seen scarier X-Files.  Hell, the "Return to the
Cathedral" and "Bonehoard" levels in the computer game "Thief" were
creepier, at least until I figured out that my fire arrows work really
well against the undead.  Other people have used "Blair Witches"
techniques of creepiness, and have done it better.  I still think "The
Shining" is the scariest movie I've seen.  Give me the two dead girls
and redrum any day.
Besides background and creepy noises, the other major part of this
movie is watching the lost hikers freak out as they slowly realize that
they're lost and that there's something in the woods with them.  I
admire how well done this was.  There's genuine fear in their faces at
points.  The film's publicity campaign stresses how much of this was ad
libbed, with actors put out in the woods with relatively minimal
instructions, and the directors and crew trying to scare the hell out
of them in the middle of night.  "Method directing".
There's an interesting article in Salon about the film makers [1].
Basically, the author accuses the film makers of violating the
relationship between them and their actors, fundamentally not trusting
them to act.  The purpose of this, apparently, was to make everything
"real".  The film makers decry standard film making for that art's
ingenious fakery.  Ironically, the signature scene in the film, when
Heather is looking into the video camera and weepingly apologizes to
everyone, must have been a scene that was relatively scripted, compared
to the strategy of rousing up the actors, disorientating them and
forcing them to run through the woods.
It's also ironic, then, that the publicity surrounding this movie is
constructed as it is.  This campaign is all wonderful fakery, aimed at
obliterating the line between reality and fiction.  Partially to invoke
the backstory, so necessary to the film's creepiness, in the lobby of
the Angelika, where I saw the movie, are a number of nice vitrines
illustrating the film's background, including a museum-like write up of
the Blair Witch legend, the film canisters for the missing hikers'
backpacks, and so on.  We won't mention the websites (though this
article does [2]) (Snopes has provided a short deconstruction of the
"facts" of the piece [3].)  They purposely blur the film's background
into our hazy memory of childhood ghost stories:  I had thought "Blair
Witch" had something to do with the actual legend, centered on New
Jersey or Pennsylvania or such (I was probably mixing the Bell Witch
[4] with the Jersey Devil [5]).  True, it's in the spirit of the
"mockumentary", but I don't believe anyone else, not "Spinal Tap", not
"Dadetown", has gone to such an extent.
I'm reminded of the excellent book, "Mr. Wilson's Cabinet of Wonders"
[6], which describes Los Angeles's Museum of Jurassic Technology [7], a
sort of piece of performance art dedicated to evoking the delicate,
momentary weightlessness of wonder:  wonder whether that exhibit is
real, and wonder that it could possibly be real.  "The Blair Witch
Project" doesn't go much into wonder, however, and doesn't venture that
far into fright.
[1] http://www.salonmag.com/ent/movies/feature/1999/07/14/blair_essay/index.html
[2] http://www.salonmag.com/tech/feature/1999/07/16/blair_marketing/index.html
[3] http://snopes.simplenet.com/horrors/ghosts/blair.htm
[4] http://www.ghosts.org/bell.html
[5] http://www.serve.com/shadows/jd.htm
[6] http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0679764895/o/qid=931978762/sr=8-4/002-7638729-7343234
[7] http://www.mjt.org/index.html

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
I have no rugs in the apartment, beyond the necessary absorbent bath
mat.  The people in the apartment below mine aren't there most of the
time, maybe on weekends but that's about it.  I think in real estate
marketting lingo, Apartment 3C is a pied-a-terre, which is French for
"I am closer to living in a Merchant-Ivory film than you are."  So, I
haven't fulfilled my lease requirements for having 80% of the floor
covered.  Nonetheless, I truly identify with the Dude when some guys
break into his apartment and pee on his rug.
"The Big Lebowski" is the Coen brothers latest film, the first since
they've achieved mainstream appeal with "Fargo".  I'm not sure what to
say about it, beyond that it was damn funny, arguably their best pure
comedy since "Raising Arizona".  Yes, "Fargo", for example, is a funny
film, but there's a certain macabre humor to the whole thing.  The body
count in "Lebowski" isn't that high, and isn't related to the main action.
The central figure is Lebowski, an unemployed bowling league member
in Los Angeles.  He doesn't call himself Lebowski -- he's the Dude to
people who know him.  In some sense, he's like the Man with No Name in
standard Westerns, except he's not quite a Man of Purpose and Action.
Through mistaken identity, his rug, which really brought the room
together, is ruined, sending him off on a quest to get a new rug.
He's the object of larger forces and designs, rather than the shaper of
these external powers, just going with the flow.
That's the basic plot.  I won't go further into it, partly for the sake of
not revelaing spoilers, partly because the the plot is there more to show
Lebowski, his friends, the people they meet, and Coens-style absurdity.
There are elegant dream sequences involving Julianne Moore, and this
fantastic shot from inside a bowling ball as it rolls down the lane.
The miracles of fibre optic cameras are revealed here.
There's not that much more to say about the movie beyond, go see it.
Yes, there may be bits and pieces of the idea of identity -- the Dude is
basically as you see him, unlike most of the other people in the movie,
even the John Goodman character who clings to Shabbat despite being an
Irish Catholic -- as well as the Dude being like a block of uncarved
wood in a sort of Taoist/Buddhist philosophizing, but, fundamentally,
it's a funny film.  Not much more needs to be said.

Title
Review for General, The (1927)
Oh, this was fun.  "The General" opened Film Forum's Buster Keaton
festival on Sunday.  I saw the screening with the live piano
accompaniment, the way silent films should be seen.  If this wasn't the
first full dose of Keaton I've seen, this is certainly the first one I
remember.  Sure, we've all seen clips, and various modern masters of
physical comedy have been compared to Keaton, but seeing one of these
old movies is something that really has to be done.
Briefly, "The General" has Keaton playing a railroad engineer in the
Civil War.  Northern spies hijack his train and abduct his girl.  He
chases them, saves her, saves the day.  On this plot, Keaton hangs
wonderful comedy, more elegantly executed and as thought out as anything
seen today.  We see his puzzled look, as the scenery changes while
Keaton is distracted, and his cringe as he realizes his girl is hidden
in the boxcar that's being piled high with heavy boxes.  We see this
wonderfully funny sequence as Keaton has trouble with a cannon his
train is pulling.  Double-takes are not exclusive to the late 20th
Century.  Gross-out jokes aren't necessary to make us laugh.  And, of
course, there's Keaton's physical comedy, his dexterity and charm, all
working splendidly.
I'm too used to modern film making ability to deliver visual spectacle.
Almost anything that can be imagined can be put on film nowadays: big
boats sinking, airplanes crashing, New York City being leveled over
and over again.  I've perhaps forgotten that spectacle is not a
monopoly of the computer graphics age, that good film makers could
deliver impressive scenes without the aid of armies of programmers and
designers.  "The General" is a good cure for this misconception.  There
are shots of Civil War-style armies on the march, which can't be done
anymore without the aid of computer processing because that many warm
bodies can't be found to march up and down a field.  There's a
spectacular -- and funny -- train wreck that puts anything in "Die
Hard" or "Speed" to shame.
Anyway, the Keaton series continues on Mondays through November.
http://www.filmforum.com/keaton.html
Bloody stupid coincidence: I'm taking swimming classes Monday evenings
(so, if I find myself on a sinking ocean liner, I won't drown
immediately), so I'm going to miss a lot of these.

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
I think it was inevitable that some guy in Idaho (or someplace like
that) would dub a film "Movie of the Decade" somewhat before the
millennium.  I'm just surprised no one has declared a "Movie of the
Millennium".  At least you'd have that bit of alliteration.
In any case, our "Movie of the Decade" for this summer is "The Truman
Show".  Jim Carrey is Truman, a man in a fish bowl, unaware that he is
being televised to the world.  The TV series of Truman's life, captured
by thousands of secretive cameras around the movie set/town of Sea
Side, is Bigger Than Seinfeld (if that can be imagined).  He has been
televised, unaware, since before birth (why not conception?), and, in
the show's 30th year, he begins to realize that his world apparently
revolves around him.
This basic plot has been used before.  Relying on the Way Back Machine,
we have the whole Descartes thing: the proof of god's existence comes
from "I think therefore I am", but raises the possibility of a Great
Deceiver, spinning an illusionary world around "I".  Arguably, spin the
Way Back dial a bit farther, and you'd come up with Plato and the Cave,
but Plato didn't mean the Cave in a literal sense, and we were in the
cave because of ourselves rather than some external entity.  Much more
recently, Philip K.  Dick played with this "what is reality" idea in
any number of novels.  There was one novella with a nicely surrealistic
moment: the protagonist, already believing there was something wrong
with the world, buys an ice cream cone, only to see the ice cream
vendor disappear, leaving behind only a slip of paper saying "Ice Cream
Cart".  The novella, however, ends more sinisterly and more
conventionally, with it being revealed that the hero was unknowingly
computing missile trajectories by solving the Sunday newspaper puzzle.
Most closely to "The Truman Show", there was a 1980s Twilight Zone in
which a man's life was the subject of a TV series.  I don't recall how
that episode ended, but I'd like to think that the discovery of the TV
studio was scripted, and that there were infinite layers of TV series
within TV series, Russian Dolls of voyeristic entertainment.
I suppose the main difference is that the narcissism has changed from
god or the devil giving sufficient damn to make up the world for us, to
the planet's television audience giving sufficient damn to watch us
brush our teeth in the morning (though, seeing that we have "America's
Funniest Videos", the Fishing Channel and C-SPAN on cable, as well as
random webcams peering into people's apartments, this shouldn't be
surprising).  Yup.  At the close of the millennium, television is our
wrathful diety.
I suppose also that the tag, "Movie of the Decade" is not
inappropriate.  It fits our media-saturated time well.
Anyway, did I actually like the movie?  Yes and no.  The "No" comes from
having problems getting into it in the first place.  I kept on thinking
"klutzy, klutzy, klutzy" as the television people when through their
acrobatics to keep Truman from realizing the truth.  There's minor
clumsiness when Truman picks up studio instructions on his car radio:
why not have rigged radios incapable of picking up certain
frequencies?  And why didn't they realize that Truman probably doesn't
know how to tack a sailboat into the wind?  You have smart people, who
have constructed an elaborate illusion of a TV studio, and yet they
don't know how to plan for contingencies beyond ham handed traffic jams
and nuclear plant meltdowns.
The most glaring clumsiness is the methods used to keep him in town:
make him afraid of the water, make him think travel is dangerous, tell
him that Sea Side is an earthly paradise.  It's easy to come up with
better ideas than this.  You can simply not tell him there's an
outside, a sort of medieval thing to do -- you'll fall off the edge,
say "hi" to the elephants and turtle on your way down -- but possible
because Truman more or less was raised in your Skinner Box.  You pretty
much can tell him anything you want.  This, though, makes him less like
us, hurting television ratings.  Alternatively, you can have this giant
inflated weather balloon roving the beaches, smothering anyone who
tries to leave.  The villagers can come up with spooky stories about
the thing, creating your prohibition.  (True, this is not "The
Prisoner", but it's a neat idea).  Perhaps best and most subtly, they
can simply use the techniques in "It's a Wonderful Life", which was
partially referred to in a TV program Truman watches: whenever he thinks
of leaving, saddle him with responsibility.  "About to go on my world
tour!  Whoops, the savings and loan is in trouble!"  There's no
weirdness in his staying -- he'll be just as good as George Bailey --
and there'll be tear jerker moments when he finds Zu Zu's petals in his
pocket.
One thing, brought up and then ignored: how do you handle Truman's
childhood friends?  He's known his best friend since they were seven
years old.  Can you trust a seven year old not to let Truman in on a
Really Big Secret?
Well, I did get into the movie more after all that.  It's an
entertaining film, not really the masterpiece that some people have
claimed, but certainly worth the two hours.  "Truman" may also mark a
new phase in Jim Carrey's career, that of a more serious actor.  He
does well in this movie: there a nice moment when he stops traffic,
realizing that he's the center of it all, and, near the end as he
reaches the edge of the world, he's convincing.  Think of Steve Martin,
going from "The Jerk" to, say, "Leap of Faith" or "The Spanish
Prisoner".  Yes, there are occasional regressions, like "Sgt. Bilko",
but his range is broader now.
-- 
"The court determined that Fox TV does not impede free and fair
competition in the teen-angst soap-com genre, therefore Party of Five
need not be broken into five 'Parties of One,' one being distributed to
each of the other networks."

Title
Review for Ten Commandments, The (1956)

I have this vague sense that I should have many of the big,
significant, epic, important, well-loved, etc., movies on hand in my
DVD collection.  While I may turn to, say, "It's a Wonderful Life"
infrequently, knowing it's there grants some peace of mind.  It's
similar to living in Manhattan, where you know you can get a roast beef
with Russian dressing at 3AM, but you may only do it once or twice
after school.
So, I recently got the 1956 version of "The Ten Commandments",
self-styled "Greatest Event In Motion Picture History", so big it takes
two RSDL DVDs and still has almost no room left for DVD extras beyond
three trailers.  I watched this in two sittings -- the intermission is
where the disks are split, and, even with the overacting and the
earnestness made all the more glaring by our irony-laden times, it's
still a fantastic movie.  It's held up well over the decades.  I
believe this is also the first time I've seen the film in a theatrical,
widescreen format.  All the previous viewings were on TV, during the
annual Passover/Easter showing of the film on ABC.  I don't quite
remember how it looked on these occasions, but I kept imagining Moses
waving his staff at an offscreen Pharoh.  Actually, the aspect ratio
was at 1:66, so it couldn't have been that bad.
I'm not sure what to say about the film.  Yes, it diverges widely from
Exodus, with three lines of Biblical verse extrapolated into three
hours of movie.  The plot and its more famous scenes have seeped in
through cultural osmosis.  The robed and bearded Charlton Heston
holding the Commandments is referenced and parodied, from Mel Brooks to
the Simpsons.  Even if you've never actually sat down to watch the
movie, these images drift in our collective subconscious.
In this sense, it's difficult if not impossible to watch the film
without some amount of self-reference and cultural commentary.  The
MST3K-style thought bubble above Heston's head, while God is inscribing
the Commandments, asking, "Hey, God, what about the right to bear
arms?" is the most obvious.  The notion that Moses should have stuck
around to become Pharoh and then freed the slaves -- changing the
system from within -- is the most post-1960s.  An notion that Joshua
could really have used some project management software during the
Exodus is perhaps the most late 1990s.  And, really, why did people
continue to listen to Dathan after each of his suggestions proves
somewhat unsound by a series of literal acts of God?  Such thoughts and
audience commentary makes for a more rolicking film.  And our
sensibilities about how films should look has changed, letting in
chuckles at the most inappropriate moments.  The most wince-worthy
moment is when the Red Sea parts, and there are these three women on a
rock, looking across the screen in windswept, forearm-to-forehead awe.
Actually, I'm sure this scene looked ridiculous and wince-worthy in the
1950s.
The political context of the film is somewhat ambiguous to me.  They
talk about freedom from slavery, and the freedom of God's law.  The
introduction by Cecil B. DeMille makes it feel like there's an
anti-Communist slant to things, which is not surprising given the time
it was made.  There are other parts here and there which almost suggest
the Civil Rights movement, which was getting underway at the time.
It's not clear how conscious Hollywood would have been of such,
though.  I suppose it's because the film's main topic, the release from
bondage and oppression, is simply resonant for America.
I should touch on the special effects.  While they're not quite
believable nowadays, they do well in the test of invoking a bit of
awe.  I guess it's all in how they're used in conjunction with the
writing and music.  Perhaps even more impressive to a fin-de-millennium
audience are the scenes done without computer effects.  In particular,
there are those moments when you go, oh, my god, there are thousands of
extras there.  The craft of filmmaking simply awes in different
ways.
As for the rest of the DVD, we only get three trailers to the film.
These trailers span decades, actually, ranging from the original
trailer, to a 1960s rerelease, to one for the 1980s rerelease.
Subsequent trailers have gotten shorter and shorter.  Interestingly,
the first trailer doesn't really look like what we'd think of as a
trailer.  Instead, it feels like a mini-documentary, where someone
talks to you about how the film was partially shot on location, how all
these Biblical scholars and historians were consulted to insure
"historical accuracy" in the script (contrast this to the recent
"Noah's Ark", which had a Hercules-Legendary-Journeys style subplot
with Lot coming at Noah as a patch-eyed pirate, or so I've been told),
to the props of the Commandments used in the film.  I didn't actually
see the end of it:  it's over fifteen minutes long, far greater than
anything that would appear on, say, Entertainment Tonight these days.
I suppose I should at least briefly talk about DVD quality.  The
picture is very good, but my television sucks, so this isn't going to
be liek the usual DVD review which rates picture quality.  I can only
tell if the image really, really blows (e.g., The Last Emperor) and
nothing else.  There is the standard stereo soundtrack, and a
remastered Dolby 5.1 one, so you can hear, say, the Hebrew slaves
shuffling around and making bricks out of your surround sound
speakers.

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
OK, I'm finally getting around to write about this movie, which I saw
this past weekend.  From a business point of view, it's a little
disappointing that the show wasn't sold out.  I suppose that simply
reflects how South Park has a certain audience, and this audience has
probably gone and seen it on opening weekend, and not the subsequent
weekend like me.
The film is truly epic.  Most TV shows that go on to become films have
a problem expanding out of their 30-minute time slots into something
larger, leaving numerous soft spots.  Witness the Beavis and Butthead
movie, any number of Saturday Night Live derived films, the revivals of
certain series from the 1970s.  "South Park" succeeds where others have
failed: not only does it make the transition from small screen to big,
it does it in grand, brilliant fashion, spanning the universe from the
deepest pits of Hell to the, uh, celestial spheres of heaven.  It's
funny throughout: the number of minutes you spend not chuckling or
laughing out loud can be counted on your fingers.  Granted, this is
mostly gross out humor and the amusement of seeing third graders curse
floridly, and it's just damn funny.  Yes, we've known all along that
South Park is a raw-for-TV show with a even more raw R-rated movie
inside waiting to break out, but seeing Cartman let loose, a sort of
apotheosis of Eric, is a wonder in itself.  It's what we've been
waiting for.
"South Park" even has a point to make, particularly relevant after the
Littleton, CO, shootings, where everything remotely connected to the
media or computer gaming industry was blamed for the violence of two
disturbed individuals.  This is not a simple, potty-mouthed movie, but
a sharp bit of social commentary as well.  A stand is taken, and I
leave it to the movie to make its argument.
One nice thing about this transition from small to big screen is that
they don't try to drag out every peripheral character that's ever been
on the show.  Yes, Damien Son of Satan is in the background, as is
Jesus and, I think, Pip, but they have no speaking roles.  It's like
any other SP episode where they have to show a crowd shot: the whole
town's there, but no talking.  I winced a few times during, say, one of
the Star Trek movies where Ensign Bob who appeared in a few episodes
back in season 5 and 6 had to get his two lines in.  When a TV series
makes it to film, it generally tries to hard to be golly gee about the
whole thing.  SP doesn't.
Not that there aren't references to South Parks Past and the other
epics of the Parker/Stone ouvre.  Kenny dies in the hospital after
having a baked potato put in his chest, an apparent reference to the
main song [1] of "Cannibal: The Musical" [2].  And the whole Brian
Boitano thing is baffling only if you haven't seen the animated short
that started it all, "The Spirit of Christmas" [3].
For that matter, one of the things little remarked upon about this
movie is the fact that it's a musical, complete with sophisticated
production numbers and a wonderful part towards the end when the main
songs of the movie are interwoven into a four-way medley.  Broadway
shows are parodied -- Les Mis was skewered -- as well as Disney
animated films -- Satan as the Little Mermaid.  This shouldn't be
surprising giving the large musical content of the weekly show, as well
as previous Parker-Stone efforts like "Cannibal" (all singing, all
dancing, all flesh-eating).
So, how would Brian Boitano end this review?
[1] http://www.wedgieworld.com/cannibal/shpadoinkle2.html
[2] http://us.imdb.com/Reviews/167/16750
[3] http://us.imdb.com/Title?0122264

Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
This seems to be the week I'm seeing a lot of movies.  "Armageddon" on
Sunday, I saw "Mulan" last night, I'm supposed to see one this evening,
and I haven't thought about the weekend yet, though I know "Last Days
of Disco" and "Henry Fool" are on some list somewhere.
Amusingly, I was sitting around this morning, waiting for the cable
guy.  Time Warner upgraded their system on the Upper West Side, and is
selling something called "MetroChoice", which lets me break that
mystical Channel 77 barrier.  It goes up to 88 or 90 now, or something
ridiculous.  In this unexplored wilderness is the Independent Film
Channel.  The new cable box is spiffy, too, having weird digital stuff,
like channel info (no more Channel 40) and a neat-o new remote control
with more buttons and an instruction booklet, unlike the crappy old
remote, with many buttons but no indication of what these buttons do
except make a LED brighten up on the cable box.  A definite
improvement.  Yes, I'm slowly approaching TV apocalypse.
So, down to business.  "Mulan" is the latest Disney animated feature,
continuing their exploration into the non-Western canon.  In brief, the
Huns are invading China, and the Emperor calls up troops to fight.
Mulan's father is drafted, but, fearing for his safety, she dresses as
a boy and takes his place.  She's accompanied by a small dragon, played
by a-long-way-from-"Raw" Eddie Murphy, a cricket and a horse.  At
training camp, after a rough start, she wins eventually the respect of
the other conscripts and the Captain.  They go off to war.  She
destroys the Hun army with a bit of ingenuity and cleverness, but her
identity is discovered.  So, she has to prove herself again.
This is a fun movie.  Eddie Murphy is pretty good, lots of laughs.
He's morphed into a family comedian over the years, and starring in a
Disney movie is the culmination of that transformation.  I've never
been a big fan of songs from Disney movies, so I'm not the best judge
for that: I thought they were fine.  Frighteningly, Donny Osmond does
some of the singing, so it's possible we'll see him at the Oscars.
(Figures from the Seventies and early Eighties seem to be popping out
of the woodwork recently.  Ricky Schroder, for example.  And there's
that "CHiPs" reunion.)
There's actually some breathtaking computer animation, better than the
dull, predictable stuff in "Godzilla" or "Armageddon": the Hun army
cresting the ridge feels like an innumerable horde, the pan of the
celebratory crowd around the Imperial Palace is elegant.
The story choice is also interesting for Disney.  Here, we have a
heroine that doesn't need rescuing: this ain't Sleeping Beauty.  And,
as Mr. Cranky (http://www.mrcranky.com/movies/mulan.html) notes, "Let's
give Disney some credit here for not pasting two cannonballs on their
forty-pound Chinese heroine."  The film is a conscious move away from
passive ideas of feminine beauty towards a notion of a girl who things
and can stand on her feet, at least according to one of the songs.  It
succeeds reasonably: she beats the Huns (twice!  Miler Time doesn't
happen after the first time), saves the Emperor, and is awarded a
counselor's position, which she declines in order to go home to see her
dad.  Along the way, the Captain becomes smitten, neatly solving the
initial Man Problem for Mulan.
Being completely indoctrinated in the Western Canon, I'm thoroughly
familiar with Hercules and Xena, but I've actually never heard of Mulan
before.  So, I invested effort into finding some synopsis of the
original "Legend of Mulan".  Infoseek gives me the following
non-Disney-related URL:  http://www.panap.com/mulan_index.html, an
outfit called "Pan Asian Publications" selling a children's book.  The
synopsis plays a bit differently from the Disney movie:
   The story of the female general, Mulan, was originally a folk song
   dating from the Northern Wei dynasty, A.D.386-534.
   According to legend, there was a young woman named Mulan whose aged
   father was conscripted. Mulan, unwilling to see her father fighting
   in a war, disguised herself as a man and joined the army in his
   place.
   For the next ten years she showed remarkable skill as a warrior and
   became a female general. Her true identity remained hidden from her
   comrades until the very end.
You can read the first five pages online.  Actually, the divergence
begins on Page 2.  Her parents know she's going off to war.  I suppose
they encouraged it, giving her money to buy arms and armor at the local
markets.  No subterfuge there.  (Vaguely surprising is why Disney
didn't pick up the "buying stuff at markets" thing: "kids, buy Mulan's
outfit, just like she did in the movie!"  I suppose that there'd be a
residual image of the Girl As Shopper if that thread were left in.)
In the original legend, at least by this synopsis, Mulan makes a career
of being a general.  In Disney's version, she's offered a career as a
stay-at-palace advisor.
Actually, I shouldn't go on about this too much.  Disney's version is
carefully honed for our time and our values.  It is not a 5th Century
legend, whose values would probably seem alien to us.  At the beginning
of the movie, when they were talking about family honor, I was thinking
of the Iliad, which I read earlier this year: Achilles version of the
ideal hero's life -- come home victorious or come home dead -- isn't
something that'll ring the bells for late 20th Century American
audiences.  A straight retelling of Mulan should have similar
problems.  Perhaps people will go out and read something of the
original sources:  after collecting the Quasi dolls, go off and pick up
Victor Hugo.  Maybe not, but it's a hope.
One quick note: it wasn't the Huns, properly, who invaded China.  "The
Huns" were the name given to North Asian nomads invading the Roman
Empire around 500 or 600AD.  The Great Wall and all that was a defense
against the various Mongol tribes.  I suppose Disney was afraid of
living Mongols complaining that they're not bloodthirsty barbarians,
and instead picked an extinct tribe to do the evil stuff.
-- 
"The court determined that Fox TV does not impede free and fair
competition in the teen-angst soap-com genre, therefore Party of Five
need not be broken into five 'Parties of One,' one being distributed to
each of the other networks."

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
I'm writing this as I'm waiting for Oracle to churn out a big new
tablespace for the developers to do some testing in later this week.
This exercise began, in 15-minute fits and starts and a spasm of
e-mail, late last week, when the request came down the line,
resurfacing Friday, when I got scheduled downtime to bounce the RDBMS
early Saturday to twiddle a parameter set by the guys who set up this
instance in the first place (two hours worth of Saturday morning
twiddling, most of it spent waiting around for the OS to do a cold
backup in case something disasterous happened), finally culminating in
executing three glorious SQL commands this Monday morning.  Yes, the
new Mike Judge movie, "Office Space", struck a small cord in the
stupidest of places, when Our Hero is watching his workstation get
bogged down in I/O.  Yes, it was a cliched scene, but I'm spending part
of my recent time watching I/O happen.  And I don't even have the
benefit of a little spinning disk to tell me something is going on.
It's an uneven movie, though.  Though it's far, far better than the
very disappointing Beavis and Butthead movie, "Office Space" is only
about as good as a good "King of the Hill" episode.  The best parts are
the wonderful moments that show the little frustrations of
post-industrial America.  Some scenes of wish fulfillment were
fantastic, most notably gutting the fish (if only he used a Leatherman)
and an ultraviolent, gangsta video inspired beating.  Their office
bulding, by the way, looked eeriely like my company's Dallas office,
which I recently had to visit: acres of parking lot surrounding a large
flat building.  The Dallas office, however, looks a bit more run down
and dimly lit than the one in the movie, at least the area where the
DBAs sat.
[Ah, that bit of I/O just finished.  Now to FTP (a continuation of I/O
by an admixture of means) a bunch of export files...]
The film loses steam towards the end, or when it gets too involved with
this Superman III-style plot hatched by Our Hero and his downsized
coworkers.  The writing's fine edge in depicting office life is lost
when it tries to move a story, a not particularly interesting one at
that.  This scheme, unfortunately, takes up a good part of the second
half of the movie.  As noted, the film is inconsistent, a better rental
than anything else.
The film also dips a toe in the more blue-collar world of food service
through Our Hero's love interest, a waitress played by Jennifer
Aniston.  No array of indignities confront the waitress, however, only
the single indignity of having to wear "flair" to spice up a drab
uniform: stupid little buttons, slogans and cheesy ties and
LED-enhanced ribbons to be worn as an expression of institutional
creativity.  The web of small indignities from, say, the customers, is
wholely absent: Judge apparently wants to focus on the absurdities that
descent from the managers up on high like manna.  Well, that, and
office equipment.  [Harpers Magazine a few issues ago had Barbara
Ehrenreich pose as a waitress for a month in a variety of places, a
sort of limosine liberal exercise in showing the inadequacy of minimal
wage.  If nothing else, that article suggests that Aniston's minimum of
fifteen pieces of flair is the least of worries.]
[So, the FTP is done.  Now, gzip -d.  Yes, I feel I'm being paid
absurdly much for absurdly little.]
Our Hero, incidentally, finds joy at the end in manual labor.
(Something I'm not unsymapthetic to, having noted that digging a ditch
at least lives you with a ditch at the end of the day, instead of this
abstraction running with the aid of metaphorical baling wire and duct
tape on some computer I've never actually seen.  But then, I've never
dug a ditch, so I really shouldn't be glorifying the whole thing, given
that I'd probably think ditch digging really, really sucks if I had to
do it, despite my going to the gym nowadays.) I suppose Judge's final
point is that there's dignity in labor or work, just that it's usually
lost in the actions of petty managers, clueless consultants and absurd
institutional rules.  It's a new dialectic: the bosses and the
bureaucracy are the new bourgeois, the owners of the mission statement
and time card.  The rest of us are the post-industrial proletariate,
office workers and glorified burger flippers.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
Yes!  A movie less plausible than "Independence Day"!  And I'm counting
the Giant Lizard Steps on New York movie, though that one came close
(Especially when they didn't take the FDR to get to the Brooklyn
Bridge.  The 59th Street Bridge was closer anyway.)
I saw an early screening of "Armageddon" on Sunday morning.  What can I
say but that the laws of physics are strung up by the thumbs and
violated in the worst way, that the folks on screen are cut from
varying thicknesses and grades of cardboard, that the broad outlines of
the film are trivially predictable, that the bomb is defused/asteroid
destroyed with 3 second left on the clock, that the special effects
departments are the biggest component of the credits and that there's a
cute dog that doesn't die?  
Remarkably and innovatively, New York City is only slightly damaged by
horizontally streaking, slow moving meteors.  It's Paris that gets it,
perhaps because of some issue with the French.  This is also the first
movie I've seen with a NASA disclaimer at the end, right next to the
"No Animals Were Harmed":  NASA neither promotes nor endorses the
contents of this film.  To sum up, it's a summer flick, one of those
delicate perenniels that must be cultivated in intense AC and popcorn.
The question is whether it's a good summer flick or a bad one.  I lean
towards not bad, certainly a good cut above "Godzilla" (which says
little), but not particularly memorable either.
I missed the first asteroid-with-an-attitude movie.  Mixed reviews,
and all I really wanted to see was the big tidal wave in "Deep Impact".
Ten minutes of effects would not be worth nine bucks and two hours of
Hallmark-like platitudes.  It'll be at a second run house soon enough,
so it might be worthwhile then.
In any case, for "Armageddon", they decided to go for serious hyperbole
in the size of the rock.  After carefully pointing out that the
proposed dinosaur killer was about six miles wide (and then correctly
showing the impact to be just off Cancun), they made the new rock
something the size of Texas.  Why not the size of Alaska, while we're
at it?  It'll hit in eighteen days, and Earth's only hope is to send up
Bruce Willis and his deep drilling team into space aboard spiffy,
remarkably maneuverable and very roomy space shuttles.  The idea is to
drill into the rock, drop a standard issue nuclear bomb down this hole,
and blow up the thing that way.  Perhaps no one noticed that there have
been innumerable underground nuclear tests, perhaps not in Texas but
certainly in nearby Nevada, and none of them have cut much of a hole on
the earth's surface.  Nuclear weapons really aren't hammers of god, at
least compared to large hunks of rock and metal.
But this asteroid is remarkable.  Not only can it be shattered by a
dinky bomb, its surface is covered with crystal growths, retains an
atmosphere sufficient to generate a melodramatic wind, has gravity out
of proportion to its size (except when inconvenient to plot), and blows
up in a Big Ring Explosion (so fashionable with big bangs in modern
movies, but apparently the result of misreading of Vietnam war
footage).  This asteroid has an attitude, a touch of sentience or at
least petulence regarding Willis's drilling activity, hailing the drill
site with small rocks and methane flares at dramatically convenient,
must-push-button times.  Oh, methane: a by-product of biological
activity, right?  I suppose all this indicates that the asteroid is
really alive, its spawn of little baby meteors having the power to seek
out concentrations of human habitation, and it just happens to be
pissed at the French.
The most important thing is that the special effects are decent, not
great, but decent.  "Lost in Space" probably has the best effects so
far this year, and "Armageddon" doesn't come that close.  The second
most important thing is the soundtrack.  No Celine Dion, so it's OK --
I guess having Liv Tyler in the movie means at least one Aerosmith
song.  In terms of plot and character development, well, they make an
attempt, which is much, much more than what can be said about
"Godzilla", but how much can you do without getting in the way of the
special effects?
They actually set up a couple of conflicts and relationships.  There's
a father-daughter conflict, between Bruce Willis and Liv Tyler, and
there's a father-prodigy conflict, with Bruce and Ben Affleck.  Stuff
gets resolved by the end: Bruce and Liv reconcile, Bruce and Ben learn
to trust each other.  We should not be surprised.  A better question
may be, how well do these actors pull off the emotional torture thing?
Well, Liv is sort of there, but not really.  Ben does his Angry Young
Hotshot thing reasonably well; he was better in "Good Will Hunting" by
far, though that may be because he had more screen time and more to
do.  Bruce is OK.  It's a less interesting role than, say, "Twelve
Monkeys", but he's quite sufficient.
Besides this, there was the handy ad campaign that showed each major
character's face with some tag line underneath, like "He's doing it for
the money", "He's doing it for his country" or "He's doing it for the
donuts."  First time I saw these at a bus stop, I couldn't figure out
what they were selling.  Sneakers?  The advertising, however, is false,
as these strokes of character and personality are all but invisible in
the actual movie.  "Seven Samurai" this is not.
The amount of American rah-rah jingoism is actually remarkable.  In
some ways, images of the American flag and America as savior of the
world (no, let me rephrase: "Savior of the World") are more pronounced
than in, say, "Independence Day".  At least there, we felt a sense of
wackiness to the proceedings, and the jingoism is, well, obvious.
"Armageddon" does it more seriously and more subtly, mainly by putting
the Stars and Stripes in the background when Bruce Willis makes a
speach about honor and loyalty.  It's not a big can't-miss-me flag, a
la "Patton", but it's there.
Oh, there was a preview for "Blade" just before this movie.  I really
want to see it, if only so I can say, "humpf, Buffy can kick Blade's
ass."
-- 
"The court determined that Fox TV does not impede free and fair
competition in the teen-angst soap-com genre, therefore Party of Five
need not be broken into five 'Parties of One,' one being distributed to
each of the other networks."

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
I was looking at the New York Times yesterday, and there was this ad
for "Microsun" light bulbs.  They're full spectrum bulbs that are made
to reproduce direct sunlight, or something along those lines.  Given
how things work in "Blade", a few of these around the house would make
a vampire's life suck.
"Blade" is the latest comic book to big screen migration.  While I
understand the project has been kicking around for many years, it was
probably the popularity of "Buffy The Vampire Slayer" that finally got
it rolling.  Actually, there was one or two other vampire movies being
previewed before "Blade": a John Carpenter film and maybe something
else (I wasn't paying that much attention).  These differ from the,
say, Anne Rice genre just before this by focusing on the "vampire
slayer", a la Buffy, rather than on vampire sex lives.  The John
Carpenter preview looked more like "Aliens" than "Dracula", actually.
Anyway, "Blade" is this superhero who's half vampire, capable of
walking in daylight, immune to garlic and such, but with a vampire's
strength.  He's pissed at all vampires for Freudian reasons, and
"pissed" is expressed in terms of large caliber guns and swords.  No
dainty wooden stake here.  There's, of course, a big bad-ass vampire he
has to go against sometime in the film, said vampire wanting to take
over the world and all.  Blade stops him at the end, after getting in
touch with his Inner Vampire.  It's a cathartic moment, capable of
making grown men cry.
Blade fares better than Spawn, the most recent comic book superhero to
go to Hollywood, at least in terms of the suckiness of the big screen
adaption.  "Blade" is actually entertaining, the action sequences fast
and well done, as opposed to the too-much-special-effects battering we
receive in "Spawn".  It's not a bad movie.
One interesting sideline they meander into with "Blade" is to have this
hematologist get bitten by a vamp.  The result is an X-Files worthy
trip into technical sounding explanations: vampires seem to have a
different blood chemistry, they drink blood because their own blood
can't sustain hemaglobins for very long, etc.  They go as far come up
with a "gene therapy" cure for vampirism.  Mystical explanations aren't
necessary for the existence of vampires: it's just a blood-borne
disease, the CDC bulletin being in the works.
Vampires also seem to be regular guys, except they have a deep thirst
for human blood.  Well, at least with the biochemical explanation,
there's no obvious reason you'd turn from being Bob the lovable office
clown one minute to Bob the homicidal maniac the next.  At least with
"Buffy", a vampire is a demon inhabiting a human body.  Perhaps
"Blade" says we're all evil at heart.  Or maybe there's a lack of
consistency.
The science bits go out the window at the end, when Demon Boy comes
down to do some damage.  I though it might have been more interesting
if this "Blood God" turned out to be a biological-warfare inspired
aerosol mist, filled with vampire cooties, turning all that come in
contact with it into vampires, as was perhaps suggested somewhere in
the film.  It would have fit in with the virus thing a bit better and
be more terrifyingly apocalyptic, but, alas, it was not the case.
Other bits of late 20th C. technology cause havoc with any sort of
vampirical mysticism.  SPF15 sunblock apparently does wonders for
vampire skin, though the good guys do have a big flash light tuned to
the UV end of the spectrum.  In this world, vampires simply tan badly.
(Interestingly, I think there might have been some UV lamps in the
disco during the opening sequence.  Care must be taken with interior
decorations.)
A Mac Powerbook is also used during the film, by the Bad Guy to decipher
such-and-such prophesy to unleash this bigger demon.  Apple has thus
far gone from being a slick tool of secret agents ("Mission
Impossible", where a Mac laptop went head to head with a PC, which
lost), to saving the world ("ID4"), and now to black arts.  Truly a
versatile little machine.  Macintosh: The Power to Take Over The
World.  Think different, indeed.

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)

I suppose the main benefit of staying up late to watch "The Mask of
Zorro" was the wonderful air conditioning you get in movie theaters.
It was something like 100 degrees out with humidity, but I was able to
wait it out before going home.  The main drawback of watching the movie
was the movie itself.  Thumbs down: not a diaster like "Godzilla" and
all the other movies I've forgotten this summer, but certainly nothing
to hoot about.
Basically, the movie goes like this: we see Zorro 1.0 in 1820 or
thereabouts, played by Anthony Hopkins with some black shoeshine on his
facial hair, doing the fancy sword play with hordes of Spanish soldiers
in ill-fitting uniforms.  It's his last ride, as the Spanish are being
kicked out of California and Mexico: his enemy is leaving.  Zorro 1.0
perhaps left a trail of breadcrumbs while making his getaway (it's
unclear), so he's unmasked, captured, infant daughter kidnapped by the
Bad Guy 1.0, wife killed.
Flash forward about twenty years.  A couple of kids who helped Zorro
1.0 have now grown up into Antonio Bandaras and Some Hairy Guy, his
brother.  During a botched robbery, Bad Guy 2.0, dressed as an American
calvary officer from the Civil War (some twenty years in the future;
his uniform is simply visionary in that regard) kills the Hairy Guy.
Antonio Bandaras gets away.  Meanwhile, a remarkably spry Zorro 1.0
escapes from prison and finds that Bad Guy 1.0 has returned, with his
daughter no less, fully grown and with ample cleavage.
Zorro 1.0 and Antonio Bandaras meet up accidentally, with Zorro 1.0
remembering the kids.  They go off to train Antonio Bandaras to be
Zorro 2.0.  At this point, the next half hour of the film looks a
little like those old martial arts movies, with the young, unruly
apprentice being taught by the wise old master.  Included are wacky
exercises, like pushups over a bunch of candles, as well as the deeply
philosophical monologues about circles and discipline.  Remarkably
quickly, Zorro 2.0's kung fu is strong enough to take his revenge on
Bad Guy 2.0: "you killed my brother, now I kill you".
Instead of this happening, we wander into a long, slow part in the
film, where Zorro 1.0 and Zorro 2.0 put on street clothes and go to a
party.  Hijinks!  Well, no, not much happens, though there's a tango
thing going on, too, between Zorro 2.0 and the daughter.  If they were
doing Zorro Meets Footloose, it might be a bit more interesting, but,
alas.  Oh, daughter is forward thinking in a late 20th C. way.
Interesting how movies must insist that our political beliefs had to
exist in Mexican California, Camelot, Reconstruction Alabama, Han
China, etc.  But I digress.
More things happen: swordfights, a very good horse-stunts sequence,
though nothing breathtaking (Jackie Chan does more on a motorcycle with
his left foot).  Yet more clevage, but they keep things PG-13.
Mistreated workers are rescued, "Leia, I am your father," Bad Guys 1.0
and 2.0 get their comeupance, various Zorros get their revenge,
reconciliation (with version numbers matching precisely), joy.  If they
didn't have cheesy computer generated sunsets (both near the beginning
and the end), it'd be a much better film.
Head scratching moments: why is Antony Hopkins, no, correction, Sir
Anthony Hopkins in this film?  I'm aware that Sir Lawrence Olivier
appeared in "Clash of the Titans" because he needed the money, but I
don't think Sir Anthony does.  He's also not Zeus, so there's no
satisfaction in hurling lightning bolts at unsuspecting golfers.
I have perhaps have watched too much Xena.  The sword fights there are
just more fun, perhaps less technically fluent, but just much more fun
than Zorro [12].0 taking on unathletic Mexican soldiers using a lot of
the same jump/flip/kick stuff.  Ai-ee-ee-ee-ee.

Title
Review for Clockwatchers (1997)

Recently, about 2PM, I had this choice: I could continue watching the
Yankee game -- it was about the 4th inning, the Yankees had scored a
couple of runs, Cone was pitching well, but I wasn't paying that much
attention -- or I could also see a movie.
I was thinking of seeing "Deep Impact", mainly to see the big tidal
wave (I had noted the wave didn't seem to go much past, say, Fulton
Street, so I thought the Upper West Side would remain dry, but, really,
I had to confirm this), but with mixed reviews, I wasn't sure if I was
up to seeing a couple hours of people being reconciled with their
family members and working out various personal issues before the comet
hits.
[I actually am not sure how the movie ends, if the big comet hits or
not.  I think it'd be funny if it didn't hit, but no one told the folks
living in the big cave.  The could emerge two years later to find a
Walmart next to the entrance.  Laughter would ensue.]
So, skipping over "Deep Impact", I sat down down and watched
"Clockwatchers", one of those low-budget indies (it has to be since
Parker Posey is in it; before I'd use Steve Buscemi as the litmus test
appears, but now that he's appeared in the other big comet/meteor
movie, "Armageddon", this assay method is now in doubt).  This is a
neat film, very fun, especially in the first hour or so.  Basically,
it's the story of four 20-something temps working in a depressing
office.
The central character is Iris starts off the movie as a shy observer,
watching her fellow temps go about trying to kill time, meet men, etc.
In many cases, they're just going through life's motions: one of them
is getting married to someone who apparently just gives her expensive
gifts, a second claims to be an actress, though nothing apparently
comes from her auditions, and the third is there trying to get a
permanent job.  This third one, played by Parker Posey, verbalizes the
existential doubts they all seem to have: as a temp, they can vanish
and no one would notice or care.  Her quest for a permanent job, or at
very least a recommendation, is her desire to leave a mark in the
world.
Things take a darker turn when the job she'd been gunning for,
executive assistant, is given to a mousy new hire.  At the same time,
someone starts stealing things from the office -- paperweights, books,
the personal effects people have to decorate their cubicles, a very
special ball of rubberbands -- and suspicion falls automatically on the
temps.  As pressure mounts on them, as they're put under more careful
scrutiny, the work friendships they had formed shows cracks.
I don't find the film to be, say, a critique of the modern American
workplace, though it shows a lot of the absurd little things that
happen in offices.  It's not Dilbert.  Rather, the idea of people
existing in a void, unconnected in any meaningful way and going through
the motions of life, is its main theme, and the vagaries and darknesses
of the modern American workplace is simply the most opportune setting
for this existential limbo.  The office is where people look for deep
connections in this significant social space and fail to find it; for
this film the particulars of unconnectedness are distilled into these
temps.
Anyway, "Clockwatchers" is a good movie, very funny in parts.
Currently, it's on one of the cable movie channels this month.
Later, I turned on CNN, and notice that the Yankees had won.  I suppose
it was a good game.

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)

Because of our current heat wave and my not wanting to really run the
AC in my apartment -- it only affects the bedroom, so having a climate
controlled living room TV session would require heroic efforts on the
part of my two little fans and severe damage to my Con Ed bill -- I
went to the local 2nd run movie house this Saturday.  Choices: "Twin
Dragons" or "Shakespeare in Love".  Not wanting to see a bad Jackie
Chan, I saw "Shakespeare".  About 30 minutes into the showing, I was
kicking myself for not seeing it when it first came out
The fanciful conceit is that Shakespeare is going through a severe case
of writer's block.  Called on to produce a comedy with at least some
pirates and a dog, he starts "Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's Daughter"
but doesn't get very far.  Things start clicking when he meets Viola De
Lesseps.  The comedy is transformed into the tragedy "Romeo and
Juliet".  This new play reflects and is reflected by Will and Viola's
brief affair: scenes are borrowed from Shakespeare's courtship of the
lady; she disguises herself as a man and acts as Romeo in the
production; passages from the draft inspire their lovemaking.  The film
is very good at visually entwining the play and the affair,
intercutting between rehearsals scenes and bedroom scenes.
There's, of course, trouble, or else "Romeo and Juliet" may well have
ended up as a comedy with a dog in it.  Fundamentally, Viola is the
prize in a marriage alliance.  Her wealthy merchant family intends to
marry her off to destitute nobility to secure a title for themselves.
The nobleman in question, of course, is a bastard (figuratively) more
interested in cash and dowry than in the anachronistically feminist
Viola, who goes to great lengths to break the taboo of women as actors;
young boys had played the women's roles.  It's for the love of poetry
and prose and the stage that she dons the wig and mustache and binds
her breasts.
The film's writers, Marc Norman and Tom Stoppard (Stoppard having that
high-brow cachet going for him), laced their script with scholarly
Elizabethan references.  I know a couple of them mainly because I've
read reviews on the film a while ago -- the boy fascinated with
stabbings is apparently a playwright from the period who specializes in
gore, the George Romero of his day.  The disguise of Viola as a boy is
in the long tradition of Shakespearean women dressing up as young men,
with "As You Like It" and "Twelfth Night" as prime examples.  There's
also the Superman/Clark Kent eyeglasses-as-disguise thing going:
Shakespeare doesn't recognize Viola, even though her boy disguise is
ridiculously thin.  This happens often in his plays.  I'm sure other
reviews can fill in on these touches.
Shakespeare's phrases are woven so thoroughly into the fabric of our
language that we're surprised when we look through Bartlett's and find
that many of the common sayings and clever quotes that we toss off come
from Shakespeare.  One wonders how Shakespeare must have looked brand
new.  One wonders how the first audience to see "Romeo and Juliet" may
have reacted.  This film should get bonus credits for evoking these
bits of wonderings.

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)

The last book I finished is something discussing society's reactions to
apocalypse and millennium.  In particular, a good part of it is about
how evangelical Christianity is shaped by the idea of Christ's imminent
return: there's the various taxa of Biblical literalism, including
Pentacostalism, Seventh Day Adventism, and so on, and this odd division
between the usual fundamentalist Protestantism and the more
"charismatic" kind, which allows for such miracles as speaking in
tongues and physical manifestations of the Holy Ghost such as faith
healing.  (Yes, it's research on apocalyptic cults that I'm into right
now.)
So I took this odd ball framework for thinking about things into the
movie theater to see "The Apostle".  Did it help any?  I'm not sure.
After reading that book, you can see some of the beliefs that motivate
Duvall's character.  The "Great Commission" of evangelical Christianity
is the spreading of the Gospel to the four corners of the world.  That
God's word is heard in every land is one of the conditions for the End
Times, a necessary event for the Apocalypse and Millennium.  And, in
the film, the Apostle's life's work is the spreading of the word, and
the establishment of churches where there were none.  This evangelism
pervades the entire film, from the Duvall character, Sonny, as a child
listening bored to a preacher to the first scene with Duvall attempting
to convert the near comatose victims of a car wreck to the main act of
the film, the building of a church in a small bayou town.  This
evangelism would be expected in any film that dealt honestly with Bible
Belt Christianity.  Note that Duvall is terrific as a preacher,
absolutely believable.  I don't know what his religious background is,
but the character of Sonny the Evangelist comes to life in this film.
I'm not sure what this movie is "about" thematically.  (Arguably, there
are many themes, and I'm being silly trying to pin down one.)  There's
one theme of rebirth and redemption -- Sonny attempts to leave his past
behind -- and I think this is what the TV ads and movie theater
previews focus on.  Sonny has committed past crimes, and has tried to
atone for them by building a new church.  But this doesn't work for
me:  he's already a preacher, he's already built churches, and the
evangelism that forms the core of his life is unchanged.  He's God's
servant, whether settled in Texas, or scratching out a new life in
Louisiana.
There perhaps is the idea of the dichotomy of the awful, messy
day-to-day world, in which Sonny has to worry about church politics,
adultery, and, yes, murder, and the unambiguous spiritual world.  He
tries to escape one into another.  But this doesn't convince me: his
evangelical style is unchanged, and to a large part his spiritual world
dominates his material world.
More credibly is the portrait of a flawed man doing good work.  This
theme may be a return to basics, or at least the basics of
fundamentalist belief: we're all sinners, and we try to do what we can
in this world, in the time allowed to us.  Further, even though we're
sinners, we can do good things.  And so we have Sonny, never quite
escaping the problems of the day-to-day world, say, jealousy at the
sight of Miranda Richardson having lunch with her ex-husband, but also
never quite failing to do good things, in particular the church he
builds in the bayou.
And I think the idea of limited time animates the film.  We all know
Sonny's on the run, and that he expects the law to catch up with him
eventually.  We understand his presence in the church he builds is
provisional and temporary.  And so, we have his eagerness to get things
done, to do good work: he wants to build an orphanage as soon as
possible, even though his co-minister wants to take it one day at a
time.  And, perhaps the connection being entirely in my own mind, I
have to think of the book I'd read, and the description of evangelical
Christianity living in the shadow of the End Times: can I assume that
the film touches on this idea also, that everything is provisional?
Anyway, a couple bang-bang notes: the church is built next to a
graveyard.  This is perhaps unremarkable, but every panning shot of the
church shows these graves.  I'll argue that the small cemetery serves
the same purpose as the skull in still life paintings -- all the
delicious looking fruit (if the artist is any good) is just temporary,
and we're all mortal, and the skull reminds us of this.
I'm used to Billy Bob Thornton having really furrowed brows, but then I
only remember him from "Sling Blade".  I've seen other films with him,
but don't really recall him in them ("One False Move" is not a bad
film, though).
The film should be a reminder that our bicoastal perception of
fundamentalist Christianity is perhaps incomplete.  Living relatively
secular lives, as we do, we tend to see the fundies more as abortion
protesters and gay bashers.  We perhaps forget that, say, the civil
rights movement (and Abolition for that matter) was originally
spearheaded by evangelicals.  We may perhaps also throw in the
liberation theology of Latin American Catholics in the face of military
governments.  The complete picture has good parts and bad parts.

Title
Review for Celebrity (1998)
This was the most grievous loss, the most heartfelt tragedy, I
encountered on my weekend quest to see the Star Wars Episode 1 preview
in a movie theater.  Granted, it doesn't rate up there with, say,
having to face a ticked off dragon guarding the castle with the damsel
in distress, but every quest has its hazards and horrors, or you'd just
be able to pick up the, uh, quested object down at the Kwik-E-Mart.
Basically, in a mild fit of mania on Friday, I wandered to some
neighborhood movie theaters, asking whether they were showing the
Preview, and, if so, with what movie.  Most of the answers were
disappointing.  The first place I went to said they were showing it
with "Celebrity."  At that point in the day, I actually wanted to see
that movie, but the show wouldn't start for three hours.  Subsequent
theaters had it with that Brad Pitt in a tux movie, or with "Enemy of
the State", which I'd seen in an earlier Preview sighting attempt.  One
theater said they were showing it, but they weren't sure with which
movie.  At the end of this long, arduous road, one theater's ticket
taker said, yeah, we're showing it, try "Celebrity" at 3:30.  This
smarmy ticket taker, looking a lot like Jon Lovitz with a goatee and
less hair, lied to me.  In this age of the Net, with free-floating
campaigns and vendettas to cause material and psychological damage to
any number of random entities, from the deserving Circuit City/Divx to
Bob, the convenience store clerk who ticked off an 3l33t3 d00d because
the Slurpee just didn't have enough syrup, I'm going to show restraint
and not -- repeat, not -- call down a fatwa against this movie theater
in the East Village that's not the one next to Webster Hall, but a
couple of blocks away.  Except for this incident, I've had good
movie-going experiences there.
Digression aside, "Celebrity" was awful.  Well, it's not as bad as
"Shadows and Fog", so it doesn't qualify as the Worst Woody Allen Movie
Of All Time, but it's up there.  This is basically supposed to be
Woody's meditation on the idea of celebrity.  It plays somewhat more
like a cross between "Annie Hall" and "Husbands and Wives" with a
number of celebrity cameos, but with all the old-fashioned
movie-goodness leached out along with the color.
The main characters are Woody Allen, played by Kenneth Branaugh, and
his ex-wife, played by Judy Davis.  The movie has a self-referencing
moment in it, when there's a film premiere from a pretentious director
who always shoots in black and white, but a more interesting
self-reference may be to have Branaugh give his Woody Allen character
some sort of Hamlet spin, but that'd hark too much back to those early,
funny films.  Branaugh does such a shockingly good job being Woody
Allen, there's really no need for Woody to step in front of the camera
again.  
In any case, there was this divorce that takes place before the movie
starts, with the Woody Allen character wanting to sow his oats and the
Judy Davis character trying to recover.  Various hijinks ensue, as the
Woody Allen character, in this incarnation, is a movie industry
reporter, chasing after various starlets and aspiring starlets.  The
exploration of celebrity is touched on briefly in his various
encounters with actors and actresses, perhaps most prominently when he
meets Leonardo DiCaprio playing, uh, Leonardo DiCaprio.  There's also
Charlize Theron as a supermodel, which made me realize that either
Branaugh is really short or Theron is really tall.  Oh, and Winona
Ryder is using a Wonderbra nowadays.  You can learn more about
celebrity by reading the back cover of the historian Daniel Boorstin's
book, "The Image" (which is where celebrity is first defined as being
famous for being famous).
Anyway, the fates of the Woody Allen and Judy Davis characters take
their expected trajectories, with one expected happiness on the road to
loneliness, and vice versa.  There's nothing much to see here.  The
story of divergent was better told in "Annie Hall", the one about
separation in "Husbands and Wives".
Oh, I finally did see the Star Wars preview the next day, unfortunately
not in a movie theater, but as an mpeg.  And, you know, this little
window showing two minutes of grainy video was far more worthwhile than
"Celebrity."

Title
Review for Vita  bella, La (1997)

The afternoon before the Oscars, I finally got around to seeing "Life
is Beautiful".  I only caught a glimpse of Benigni's victorious
stepping on of Spielberg as he clampered over the seats; I was tired
and went to sleep early.
The movie has achieved a large share of acclaim, but there are also
many detractors who argue that this slapstick comedy partially set in
the Holocaust verges on Holocaust denial.  Among of the examples I've
seen include the New Yorker's film critic in two seperate articles,
because the first one was too short to contain his arguments; an NPR
piece that included commentary from Art Spiegelman, the author of Maus,
who takes it personally as Benigni appears to be using the Holocaust as
a metaphor, a corruption of Maus's use of using metaphor to approach
the Holocaust [1]; and Salon's reviewer [2].
I went into the film with this critical baggage.  This, of course,
colors the film in a certain way: one starts to look to see if the
movie confirms the criticisms.  I'm not sure how important this is, as
no film is seen in a vacuum of personal experience.
To summarize the basic plot (and get the obligatory bits of a review
over with), we should note that the movie starts as a light romantic
comedy.  Benigni plays a waiter, pursuing a woman he literally runs
into.  There are complications: she's engaged to the local Fascist
boss, who Benigni previous met in, well, let's say comic
circumstances.  Over the first hour of the film, Benigni's clown charms
her, wins her over.  Some years later, we find them their life together
happily settled, with a precocious son scampering around.  This idyll
is shattered when the Nazis come and the family is taken to a death
camp.
To keep his son alive, Benigni spins a story for him: the routines of
the camp are an elaborate game, and the winner gets a big tank as first
prize.  Elaborations are improvised: when the rest of the children
vanish, Benigni tells his son they are hiding, and that he should hide
too.  The charade continues until the end, when the war is over and the
Americans roll in to liberate the camp.
I actually found this to be a fine film, but weightless.  It makes a
statement about love and humor conquering all, but it is not a tested
proposition.  Yes, Benigni is still able to act as a clown to keep his
son alive and believing, but there was never any indication in the film
that he could not act as a clown.  There is little evidence in the film
that his character changes with circumstance, that he is not
compulsively the way he is.  There is then no doubt that love and humor
will conquer in this film: they simply exist and continue to exist,
unchallenged by any real despair or doubt.
It's in this nonexistence of despair that I see the point of the film's
detractors, and why they argue that it approaches Holocaust Denial
Lite, which asserts that while the Holocaust happened, it really wasn't
that bad.  Yes, there are unrealistic touches with the physical
presentation of the camp: it looks a whole lot like a summer camp, with
fairly roomy barracks for the inmates.  The guards have a touch of
Hogan's Heroes about them (the actor who plays the SS guard spelling
out the camp's rules, in fact, almost loses it and laughs out loud to
Benigni's antics).  Security is interestingly lax, as Benigni is able
to get to the camp loudspeaker for quite a long time without
interruption, as well as put a record player to good use in cheering up
his distant wife [3].  But more importantly, there's a lack of despair
or oppression, except for a few dramatically conducive moments.  In
some sense, the Holocaust isn't the Holocaust.  In this movie, the
Holocaust is merely a big bummer.
Interestingly, the one surreal moment of the film, when Benigni is
taking is son home from the Officer's mess, the dreamlike fog parts and
he sees a scene from a Breugel [4]: a mound of dessicated, naked
corpses, what remains after Death has conquered all.  Perhaps the
decision to make this sequence otherworldly is acknowledgement that
this ultimately light film cannot incorporate the reality of the death
camps within its frame.  It's in this sequence that the film comes
closest to breaking through its comic straightjacket, to shake off its
rictus of a smile.  We see a hint that the clown may well be confronted
by despair, but the hint doesn't last.
The film only works at one level, the simple one in which love,
compassion and humor can overcome the most dire of circumstances.  One
critic noted that "Life is Beautiful" could have become a great ironic
fable if the child was fully aware of what the camp was for, but was
playing along with the father to maintain his father's sanity and faith
that things will work out in the end.  But Benigni doesn't take this
path; it's unclear if you could have.  Another route may have been to
take seriously the notion that this film is a fable constructed from
the wartime memories of a six-year-old boy: the
death-camp-as-summer-camp is the world his father created for him,
hiding the reality.  Of course things were more pleasant; the loving
father has spun a necessary illusion.  But this is another road not
taken, and the film's message remains uncomplicated.
[1] http://www.npr.org/ramfiles/me/19990317.me.11.ram
[2] http://www.salonmagazine.com/ent/movies/reviews/1998/10/30reviewa.html
[3] There's a similar scene in "The Shawshank Redemption".  I think
it's in the Stephen King short story, but I don't remember.  I'm
curious about the precedents for the record player stunt.
[4] http://www.fhi-berlin.mpg.de/wm/paint/auth/bruegel/death.jpg

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)

The basic story of "Good Will Hunting" is that of a Boston townie, a
20-year-old blue collar guy too cutely named Will Hunting (or is the
movie too cutely titled?), who, while sweeping the corridors of MIT,
happens to solve graduate-level math problems when no one is looking.
He's apparently better than the MIT professors, including the resident
Fields Medalist (read: Nobel Prize in mathematics).  He plays a sort of
mathematician's elf, who builds intricate and subtle theorems at night.
Will Hunting is not an idiot-savant.  He's actually an autodidact who
happens to be brilliant at sciences, at math in particular.  He also
has an asshole personality, you know, the type that's been made heroic
in movies over the years.  The young brilliant rebel thing, who has
social problems and a long rap sheet.
He's eventually discovered by the Fields Medalist, and, in a deal with
the court to get Will out of jail time for assaulting a cop, the MIT
professor takes him under his wing.  They'll solve math problems
together.  Our prodigy also has to seek counsoling.  The counsoling
psychiatrist turns out to be Robin Williams, in a role somewhat
reminiscent of the Oliver Sacks one in "Awakenings" and the Fisher King
in that Holy Grail movie.  Williams is good in this, by the way.
In any case, the movie annoyed the hell out of me until we began the
psychiatric sessions and the meat of the story, mainly because this
story of the unrecognized genius solving math problems that
professional mathematicians can't do is an old urban legend, derived
from the true story of how George Danzing came up with the simplex
method as a grad student in Berkeley.  It was also doing the math in an
annoying way, even though I haven't really touched the subject in many,
many years.  Complex proofs apparently can be stated on a single
blackboard panel, deep theorems and their proofs, beyond the
understanding of a Fields Medalist, can be described on a single sheet
of loose leaf, and so on.  Movies, to be effective, have to make you
suspend belief, and, sometimes, little things will shatter this
suspension for some people.  For New Yorkers, a scene of characters
walking instantly from Zabar's to the Met will do this.  For me, in the
first part of this film, it was this reference to the urban legend,
because I know how badly the legend is phrased, and because I dropped
out of math grad school with my inferior parietal lobe somewhat worse
for wear. [1]
Actually, another thing I find interesting is the movie's portrayal of
intellectuals.  This falls back to the old American distrust of
intellectuals -- the two most prominent ones in the film, the somewhat
effete, scarf-wearing Fields Medalist and this Harvard history grad
student in some bar hitting on Minnie Driver -- are both thoroughly
trounced, both subtly and obviously, by the Southie Will Hunting.  He's
better than them, morally, intellectually, physically.  As said, it
pushes those buttons in the American psyche.  As a side note, one of my
math professors wore a scarf just like the Field Medalist's, but he was
French, and, as an American, I just classified that habit as a French
thing.
Anyway, after this first part was out of the way, I actually liked the
film a lot.  The interactions between Robin Williams and the boy are
well written, well acted.  The same between the boy and his love
interest.  It's good movie making.  The general story is what you'd
expect in this sort of situation -- redemption, forgiveness, and so on
until a tear-filled catharsis followed by going after the girl -- but
the film handles it well.  It's a good movie, highly recommended.
One nice thing, showing the screenwriters' Harvard heritage: the neat,
non-explicit Bostonisms, mainly the ubiquitous presence of Dunkin'
Donut coffee cups and Au Bon Pain.  The townies also have a strong
Boston accent which I actually find harder to understand than, say,
Mimmie Driver's British accent, and they talk about the Red Sox like
it's an old-time religion.
While math is not the primary focus of the film, I found the way
it was used interesting, though perhaps not unexpected.  Basically,
we see only a dense wall of symbols and notation, a veritable foreign
language without a Rosetta Stone for the audience, followed by a QED.
For all intents and purposes, Will Hunting could have been writing in
Sanskrit with little difference.  Math, however, can inspire the fear
of god in people, while Sanskrit probably doesn't.  
So, with the various genius movies in the past few years, the majority
have been with music ("Shine", "Amadeus", and maybe one or two others),
chess ("Searching for Bobby Fisher"), and just general genius ("Little
Man Tate").  As said, there's surprisingly not a single math genius in
there (with the possible exception of "Relativity", the Richard Feynman
film, though that had more to do with Feynman and his wife, and not
Feynman's brilliant physics), despite math's higher intimidation
factor, its particular mysteriousness.  The only other thing I remember
that used a math genius was the Tom Stoppard play, "Arcadia" (and it
was used evocatively).
But this isn't that relevant.  The movie, in the end, is about a
troubled youth that just happens to be a prodigy.  It's that genre,
rather than the genius genre.  Well, geniuses, I think, tend to be
depicted as troubled in one way or another, and the movies tend to
focus on them reconciling these troubles, so that doesn't say much --
I'm not sure if there is a "genius" genre.  Except for "Amadeus",
actually, which was about a lesser light reacting to genius.  Now, that
was a good film.  Actually, same for "Arcadia", the Stoppard play,
which is about other people's reaction to genius.  Actually, I'm not
sure what my point is here.  Ignore me.
I recently finished a little book on Fermat's Last Theorem.  That book,
far more than this film, almost made me pull down my old Herstein's
"Topics in Algebra" from my bookshelf (Lang's "Algebra" is too
intimidating).  There's a vague desire to see Galois Theory again, in
the old, very particular sense of "see".  But this is perhaps just
nostalgia, brought on by the book's chatter on fields and abelian
groups.
[1] That's the substance of the UL that seems to be based in George Danzig:
A professor talks about "impossible" math problems in class, and puts a
few up on the board as examples.  Undergrad gets into class late,
thinks the problems on the board is homework, goes home, complains that
they were really hard but solves them.
The moral of the UL is the usual one about not thinking things are
"impossible", and that sometimes the student is smarter than the
teacher.  There's a positive thinking thing going on, as well as the
Biblical one, the "from the mouths of babes" thing.
The real story about Danzig is that he was a grad student -- and so a
different kettle of fish altogether -- and the professor was putting
some open problems on the board.  Open problems are very different from
"impossible" problems.
Actually (falling into math folklore), there's a legend apparently told
by Danzig that I heard second or third hand from professors.  It's a
von Neumann story, actually, and perhaps belongs in that subgenre.
This is after Danzig got his PhD, and is doing postdoc work at
Princeton.  Von Neumann is there, and Danzig goes up to him to describe
the simplex method.  So Danzig is up at the board, writing things down,
and after a really short amount of time (the length apparently
decreases with each retelling by Danzig), von Neumann gets up and says,
"oh, that", sits Danzig down, and proceeds to describe a number of
implications of the method.  The moral is that von Neumann, after
working on game theory for all those years, basically had the ideas of
the simplex method swimming around the back of his head, not quite
formalized.  A simpler moral: von Neumann is god.

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)

This is John Woo's third film in America.  He's the supreme Hong Kong
action film directory, best known for a certain balletic violence.
Dead-eyed men with unlimited ammunition shoot at each other in a
landscape of easily shattered glass and pottery.  In slow motion.  Amid
doves and billowing sheets.  Usually with choir music in the
background, or with silences amplifying the sound of spent shells
hitting the ground.  No, really, I think this is terrific, just easy to
get carried away with, and easy to mock when that happens.
The problem with Woo's first American film, "Hard Target", was that Van
Damme was in it.  There are flashes of the Woo style, but they're
overwhelmed by the Van Damme-ness of the exercise.  "Do not hunt what
you cannot kill", spoken in that thick Flemish accent of his.  The
second film, "Broken Arrow", was less restrained, much more exuberent.
I remember a review noted that the reason there wree two nuclear bombs
in the movie was so that Woo would have a chance of blowing up one of
them somehere in the middle.  And that wouldn't be the most spectacular
piece of action film making.  This movie was an improvement over the
Van Damme film, but the occassional moments when Woo had his trademark
scenes felt forced, and easily mocked: Travolta, too cool for this
world, lighting a cigarette in slow motion, walking away from an
explosion while doing so, synth music filling the air.  And there
wasn't enough glass to shoot out in the movie, not enough vases to
shatter.  The movie takes place in a desert, after all.
In the first 15 minutes of "Face Off", there was a serious danger of
Woo's trademarks being overused.  The shot with Nicholas Cage getting
out of the car at the airport in slow mo, the wind whipping up his long
coat, too cool for words, as the worst of them.  But the film picked up
after these first gaffes.  The Woo signature shots were more
understated, not really calling attention to themselves.  Yes, there
was the bit near the end, with white doves and billowing white
curtains, but that felt appropriate.
The plot of the movie is a bit like "The Prince and the Pauper", I
suppose.  The bad guy and the good guy switch places, and live each
other's lives for a while.  But don't pay too much attention to the
plot (which isn't half bad), and ignore the small facts about
establishing identity in the modern world.  Too much attention  to that
and the problems of carrying around that much ammo will get in the way
of virtuoso action film making.  There are Mexican standoffs (Though
nothing will touch the Mexican standoff from "The Killer", when the men
have their guns trained at each other's heads, and a blind girl is
trying to serve them tea, unaware of the lurking violence.  They circle
through a small apartment, 9mm and tea service in hand.  The glory of
this scene is that it was damn funny -- Woo seems to have become less
funny, actually, though after working with the less-than-humorous Van
Damme who can blame him? -- and has a certain, "Can you top this?" feel
too it, as he extends to scene for more minutes than you think he
possibly could.), lots of glass being broken in slow motion, a fair bit
of jump-to-one-side-a-gun-in-each-hand shooting (in slow motion), and a
speed boat sequence that suggests Woo may miss Victoria Harbor (not in
slow motion, except the explosion at the end).  The most inspired
moment is in the gangster's penthouse, just after Travolta says, "I
guess we'll just have to kill each other." I won't spoil it, like some
of the TV commercials spoiled it, but it was inspired.
In any case, the new Jackie Chan movie will be out in a couple of
weeks.  He's clearly survived the Mountain Dew commercial, so who wants
to catch this on openning night?

Title
Review for Twin Falls Idaho (1999)

Firstly, "Twin Falls Idaho" goes for the too cute punning movie title,
sort of along the lines of "Good Will Hunting" being side-swiped by a
certain David Lynch TV series.  Once we get over this fact, groaning if
necessary, we have a neat little indie movie with a certain Lynchian
spirit of the ordinary grotesque; I don't think the title's allusion to
"Twin Peaks" is coincidental.  Ignore it's occassional obviousness,
like we see in the title: the film is worth seeing.
The basic plot of the film involves an archetypal hooker with a heart
of gold, named Penny in this case, going to a seedy hotel to meet her
next john.  This john isn't Richard Gere, come to rescue her from her
troubles; this john turns out to be the conjoined Falls twins.
Freaky.
Certainly Penny thought so, as she panics and leaves as they're in the
bathroom politely getting her a glass of water.  Realizing her purse
was left in the room, she sheepishly goes back to claim it, and finds
that the twins are busy having a quiet birthday celebration for
themselves.  With this sad scene, we begin the strange friendship that
turns into a love story between Penny and Blake, the stronger of the
twins.
Here and there, the "twins" and "pairs" images and puns are a little
strong and unnecessary.  Yes, we get the picture: the twins are a
particular entity, and separation would destroy them.  Perhaps the most
heavy-handed image is when the twins are in public, drying to reach
their hotel room during daylight: they sit down, exhausted with their
flight, and a crowd gathers around them to take pictures of this
spectacle of Siamese twins.  Yes, the bars represent how zoo-like the
scene is, and how the twins are treated by most of us as animals, not
humans.  We get it.  
Along with the love story, a love story in which the two lovers can
never be alone, the film develops the twisted family relationship of
the twins.  Their mother abandoned them; they are brothers that can
never be apart; and so on.  The notion of solitude and the unending
lack thereof is, of course, a central theme.  The movie is primarily a
series of quiet conversations between the twins and Penny -- the twins
themselves speak to each other in whispers -- exploring these ideas.
The set-piece exception is a Halloween party Penny takes them to: the
twins are simply "in costume" there, and can move around in the open
without stares.  There, of course, is another of the heavy-handed
images, where another pair of costumed Siamese "twins" get fed up with
each other and split up.
Ultimately the story moves in this direction.  In the film's last act,
Francis, the weaker twin, falls mortally ill, and it becomes clear that
the twins will have to undergo their own separation.  The split is
final: Francis won't survive the operation.  The dreamy sequence
showing this works well, far better than any of the other more obvious
symbols the film tosses at us.  I feel that it's the climax of the
film, though there is a nice, bucolic coda that follows, tying up the
lose ends.
Overall, despite my harping on the film's occasional heavy-handedness,
I liked the film.  Certainly it's different from the usual,
action-laden summer flick.  Further, the twins are each fully realized
individuals, nothing like stock evil-twin-good-twins or
angry-at-world-misfits from Central Screenwriting.  Real people.  And
the pace is slow:  it allows you to savor the characters the Polish
brothers have created here, the appreciate the strangeness of the
situation.
